CIK: 1321732
Company Name: PENUMBRA INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2016-03-08
Accession Number: 0001628280-16-012417


ITEM 1 BUSINESS. Overview References herein to we, us, our, Company, and Penumbra, refer to Penumbra, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries unless the context specifically states otherwise. Penumbra is a global interventional therapies company that designs, develops, manufactures and markets innovative medical devices. We have a broad portfolio of products that addresses challenging medical conditions and significant clinical needs across 2 major markets, neuro and peripheral vascular. The conditions that our products address include, among others, ischemic stroke, hemorrhagic stroke and various peripheral vascular conditions that can be treated through thrombectomy and embolization procedures. We are an established company focused on the neuro market, and we recently expanded our business to include the peripheral vascular market. We focus on developing, manufacturing and marketing products for use by specialist physicians, including interventional neuroradiologists, neurosurgeons, interventional neurologists, interventional radiologists and vascular surgeons. We design our products to provide these specialist physicians with a means to drive improved clinical outcomes through faster and safer procedures. We attribute our success to our culture built on cooperation, our highly efficient product innovation process, our disciplined approach to product and commercial development, our deep understanding of our target end markets and our relationships with specialist physicians. We believe these factors have enabled us to rapidly innovate in a highly capital efficient manner. Since our founding in 2004, we have had a strong track record of organic product development and commercial expansion that has established the foundation of our global organization. Some of our key accomplishments include launching our first product, for neurovascular access, in the U. S. in 2007; establishing our direct neuro salesforce in the U. S. and Europe in 2008; launching the first 510(k) cleared, aspiration based product for the treatment of ischemic stroke patients in 2008, and launching four subsequent generations of that product; launching our first neurovascular coil for the treatment of brain aneurysms in 2011; launching our first peripheral vascular product in 2013; and establishing our direct peripheral vascular salesforce in the U. S. and Europe in 2014. We sell our products to hospitals primarily through our direct sales organization in the U. S., most of Europe, Canada and Australia, as well as through distributors in select international markets. In 2015, we generated revenue of $186.1 million , which represents a 48.3% increase over 2014 , and $4.2 million in operating income as compared to an operating income of $30 million in 2014 . For the year ended December 31, 2014 , we generated revenue of $125.5 million , which represented a 413% increase over 2013 , and $30 million in operating income as compared to an operating loss of $11 million in 2013 . 3 Table of Contents Our Products Since our founding in 2004, we have invested in expanding our product development and marketing capabilities. These investments have included engineering and materials science capabilities, pre clinical and bench testing infrastructure and in house clinical and regulatory infrastructure. Our fully integrated organization has enabled us to launch 16 product brands for access, thrombectomy and embolization since 2007 to service our 2 target end markets. The following table summarizes our product offerings in each of our target end markets 4 Table of Contents OUR NEURO PRODUCTS Neurovascular Access Accessing the brain through the tortuous neurovasculature has been a substantial challenge for physicians treating vascular disorders in the brain. Companies developing products for neurovascular applications have historically leveraged technologies developed for use in coronary or peripheral vascular interventions. This approach created challenges given the vastly different anatomy, structure and sizing of the neurovascular vessels. Our portfolio of neurovascular access products includes our Neuron Access System catheters, BENCHMARK Intracranial Access System catheters and a variety of microcatheters. Neuron Access System We recognized the challenges posed by existing access technologies and focused our initial efforts on developing a guide catheter system designed specifically for neurointerventional procedures. Our Neuron delivery catheter is a variable stiffness guide catheter with increased support in the aortic arch, which enables trackability to access the intracranial vasculature. The design of Neuron enables physicians to position the catheter much higher in the anatomy than conventional guide catheters. We believe the Neuron family of guide catheters and the Penumbra distal delivery catheters that we subsequently introduced have enabled many neuro endovascular procedures that previously had not been possible in the tortuous anatomy of the neurovasculature. We have continued our development and currently offer a wide range of catheters that enable delivery of the different therapeutic catheters that are required for ischemic and hemorrhagic stroke interventions. Our Neuron products include the following The Neuron Intracranial Access System is indicated for the introduction of interventional devices into the peripheral, coronary and neuro vasculature. The system is a 2 catheter system comprised of the Neuron Delivery Catheter and the Select Catheter. The Neuron Delivery Catheter is a variable stiffness, large lumen catheter that combines proximal arch support with a microcatheter like distal segment that is designed to access the intracranial anatomy. The Neuron can be used individually with a 0.038 inch guidewire, or together with the Neuron Select Catheter, to access the desired location. The Select Catheter is a single lumen, braid reinforced, torquable catheter with a radiopaque distal end and a hub on the proximal end. The Select Catheter enables primary access with the Neuron Delivery Catheters, obviating the need for an extra guide catheter. The Neuron MAX System is an additional configuration to the currently available Neuron Intracranial Access System. The Neuron MAX System is a long sheath catheter with a flexible distal tip for neurovascular use and provides a larger lumen to enable a wide range of device compatibility in neurovascular procedures. BENCHMARK Intracranial Access System Advances in our catheter technology, driven largely by our advances in ischemic stroke therapy, have enabled us to further develop our intracranial access category of products. Our latest development in this category is the BENCHMARK catheter, which features additional improvements in ease of use, trackability, and aortic arch support that we believe will further enhance our position in the neurovascular access market. The BENCHMARK catheter technology achieves these improvements by combining our advanced tracking technology with the original Neuron intracranial access concept. In addition to improved proximal support in the arch through multi geometry metal reinforcement, the distal tip is softer and more trackable, while maintaining complete distal shaft radiopacity for improved visualization. The BENCHMARK also is available pre packaged with a Select catheter to obviate the need for a neurovascular guide catheter exchange, which reduces the number of devices needed per procedure and shortens procedure times. Ischemic Stroke Penumbra System We developed our aspiration based Penumbra System family of products to enable specialist physicians to revascularize blood vessels that are blocked by clots in the intracranial vasculature. We launched our first Penumbra System product in 2008 in the U. S.. We believe ACE, launched in June 2013, and ACE 64, launched in May 2015, represent significant advancements over prior generations of the Penumbra System. 5 Table of Contents Overview of the Penumbra System Our Penumbra System family of products is comprised of several principal comp1nts, which include Penumbra Reperfusion Catheters are the cornerst1 of the Penumbra System and are manufactured using a variety of proprietary processes and materials science innovations. We have launched five successive generations of Reperfusion Catheters since 2008. The latest generation of our Reperfusion Catheters, the ACE family of catheters, represents our most powerful and trackable Reperfusion Catheters launched to date. Its design enables specialist physicians to track these large bore aspiration catheters to the distal locations of occluded vessels. Once at the site of the occlusion, ACE provides significantly greater aspiration power than our prior Reperfusion Catheters, which we believe contributes to improved clinical outcomes and reduced procedure times. ACE 64, our latest generation of ACE catheter, is designed to offer enhanced aspiration power relative to prior generations of the product, while maintaining trackability. ACE 64 launched in the U. S. in late May 2015. Penumbra Separators are a comp1nt of the earlier generations of the Penumbra System and enable a physician to remove an aspirated clot that has aggregated in the Reperfusion Catheter during the procedure. The Separators were an important comp1nt of our earlier Penumbra System due to the smaller diameter of our original Reperfusion Catheters, which resulted in frequent obstruction of the catheter. With the launch of our larger diameter ACE, Separators are less frequently used by physicians. 3D is a stent retriever comp1nt of the Penumbra System that allows a physician to combine direct aspiration with stent retriever technology. 3D is being evaluated in a clinical study pursuant to an Investigational Device Exemption (IDE) to obtain clearance under Section 510(k) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (FD&C Act). With 198 of the anticipated 230 patients enrolled, the Data Safety Monitoring Board for this study recently temporarily suspended further enrollment in order to assess the data. The Board indicated that the suspension was not due to safety issues. Penumbra Aspiration Pumps are attached to our Reperfusion Catheters and provide the aspirating suction force. Our second generation MAX Aspiration Pump features increased aspiration capabilities and an improved, easier to use design. We have standardized the MAX Aspiration Pump to work with all generations of our Reperfusion Catheters. Evolution of Penumbra System Reperfusion Catheters The Penumbra System Reperfusion Catheters are the foundation of the Penumbra System. The principal generations of our Reperfusion Catheters include the original Penumbra System, Penumbra System MAX, Penumbra System ACE and Penumbra System ACE 64. We have introduced five successive generations of these catheters since early 2008. Each subsequent generation of our Reperfusion Catheters has incorporated significant performance enhancements relative to prior generations with regard to trackability and aspiration power. 6 Table of Contents The Generations of the Penumbra System The Original Penumbra System Our original Penumbra System was CE marked in September 2006 and 510(k) cleared by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in December 2007. The Penumbra System is intended for use in the revascularization of patients with ischemic stroke within eight hours of symptom onset. Our original Penumbra System was evaluated in the Penumbra Pivotal study, a 125 patient clinical study to assess the safety and effectiveness of the Penumbra System in the revascularization of patients presenting with ischemic stroke. This study was sponsored by Penumbra to support and obtain regulatory clearance for the original Penumbra System. The Penumbra Pivotal study demonstrated an 816% success rate in achieving successful revascularization. The study was completed in 2007 and the results were published in the journal Stroke in 2009. We had commissi1d and subsequently evaluated the Penumbra System in our THERAPY study, a clinical study comparing the clinical outcomes in the medical management of stroke patients with IV recombinant tPA (rtPA) to stroke patients treated with a combination of IV rtPA and the Penumbra System. The THERAPY study was commenced in March 2012, and was designed to enroll up to 692 patients, but was stopped early in October 2014, because the positive results of the MR CLEAN study made it unethical to continue to treat the control group in the THERAPY study with medical management rather than with endovascular treatment. The MR CLEAN study demonstrated the superiority of endovascular treatment of stroke over medical management. As a result, the steering committee for THERAPY recommended stopping enrollment for the trial. The THERAPY study results, after the randomization of 108 patients, were presented in April 2015 at the European Stroke Organization Conference and the manuscript is being prepared for submission to a peer reviewed journal. Despite the early termination of the study, the pre specified per protocol analysis demonstrated a significant benefit of combined treatment with IV rtPA and the Penumbra System over IV rtPA al1 Penumbra System MAX The Penumbra System MAX applies our advanced tracking technology and improved aspiration power to the Penumbra System aspiration platform. Launched in 2011, the 3MAX and 4MAX Systems feature MAX Tracking Technology that allows access over a solo guidewire for an even faster, easier procedure than with our original Penumbra System. The proximal shaft of these specialized catheters incorporates tapering, larger diameters, enabling increased aspiration power. In August 2012, we launched the 5MAX, which added our MAX Tracking Technology to an even larger dimension Reperfusion Catheter. 7 Table of Contents ACE Almost a decade of research and product development culminated in the introduction of our first ACE Reperfusion Catheter in July 2013 ACE features a unique tapered design, large lumen diameter and other developments that result in significantly greater aspiration power and improved trackability compared to our earlier original Penumbra System and Penumbra MAX products. Given its improved aspiration power and larger lumen size, our ACE Reperfusion Catheter can enable the extraction of a fibrous thrombus without fragmentation and often in 1 solid piece. This leaves the longitudinal fibrin strands in the clot intact, allowing the thrombus to retain its integrity. We believe this is evidenced in our post launch clinical experience, in which clinicians have seen high rates of TICI 3 revascularization, representing complete recanalization of the affected area, using our ACE catheters. Our ACE 64 Reperfusion Catheter was launched in the U. S. in May 2015. It is built on our ACE platform and offers an increased lumen diameter, which leads to further increased aspiration power and which we believe will aid in the removal of clot from the neurovasculature. Neurovascular Embolization Given the minimal product differentiation among the existing coils on the market, we concluded that to initially penetrate this market successfully we would have to develop a coil that was materially easier to deliver, and provided a procedural economic advantage. We also identified a segment of aneurysms that traditional neurovascular coils could not effectively treat on a cost effective basis. These included larger aneurysms and other larger, more complex lesions. We estimate that these aneurysms and lesions currently represent less than 10% of the addressable aneurysms. The Penumbra Coil 400 We developed our Penumbra Coil 400 to offer an improved alternative for the treatment of larger aneurysms and other larger, more complex lesions. We implemented several proprietary design innovations to enable the coil to maintain shape while achieving biomechanically stable occlusion. Our coil system is composed of a platinum embolization coil complemented by a nitinol inner structure and stretch resistant nitinol wire. It is attached to a composite delivery pusher with a radiopaque positioning marker. The Penumbra Detachment Handle offers instant mechanical detachment of the coil and can be controlled by the physician in the sterile field. We received 510(k) clearance for the Penumbra Coil 400 in 2011 The Penumbra Coil system is FDA cleared for endovascular embolization of intracranial aneurysms and other neurovascular abnormalities. Review of Penumbra Coil 400 Clinical Performance Given the size and handling of the Penumbra Coil 400, it is able to achieve higher packing density with fewer coils compared to competitive coiling systems. These findings have been confirmed in numerous physician sponsored post marketing studies. Collectively, the clinical studies have shown that use of the Penumbra Coil 400 resulted in less retreatments or worsening occlusions; larger aneurysm treatment capabilities; higher packing density; and fewer coils per aneurysm. Penumbra SMART Coil Leveraging our initial experience treating larger aneurysms and more complex lesions with the Penumbra Coil 400, we turned our efforts to developing a standard sized coil to compete in the traditional, smaller neurovascular coil market. While the market has seen significant growth over the last 15 years, there has been very little innovation in the last several years with regard to coil design, material science and performance. As a result, neurovascular coils built on the traditional, smaller coil platform offer very little differentiation in terms of materials, ease of use and trackability. In light of these dynamics, we focused our development efforts on a coil that would improve ease of delivery, or feel of the coil compared to the leading established coils. In order to accomplish this, our engineering team developed a highly sophisticated coil that dramatically changes its softness profile within the span of a single individual coil. This progressive softness feature enables physicians to pack the coil into a delicate lesion and mitigate catheter kick back at the end of delivery, which can preclude the successful complete embolization of the lesion. 8 Table of Contents The Penumbra SMART Coil is designed to treat patients with a wide range of neurovascular lesions, including the small and medium sized aneurysms that comprise the majority of the neurovascular coiling market. Alternative products available to physicians in this market are offered in single levels of softness standard, soft or extra soft. The 3 principal levels of softness that competitors offer are derived from using smaller platinum filaments to increase the level of softness. However, this methodology does not allow for changes to the softness level within an individual coil. The design of the Penumbra SMART Coil allows the level of softness to be determined not only by the diameter of the platinum filament, but also by a structural comp1nt inside the coil itself. This development enables the Penumbra SMART Coil to become progressively softer within the span of an individual coil. We introduced our SMART Coil in the fourth quarter of 2015. We believe that it will provide us with another important opportunity to offer specialist physicians a broader suite of products to address their neurovascular coiling needs. Neurosurgical Tools The Apollo System We received 510(k) clearance from the FDA for our first neurosurgical product, the Apollo System, in 2014. The Apollo system leverages our expertise in thrombectomy and access to offer a minimally invasive approach to surgical removal of fluid and tissue from the ventricles in the brain. The Apollo system is comprised of 2 primary comp1nts the Apollo wand that is inserted into the brain through an endoscope, which, in turn, is inserted through a small burr hole into the skull; and a reusable hardware device that delivers vacuum, irrigation and vibrational energy along the disposable wand to the site of the hemorrhage. OUR PERIPHERAL VASCULAR PRODUCTS After initially focusing our business on our neuro products, we identified the peripheral vascular market as an ideal opportunity to leverage our neuro experience and our core expertise in thrombectomy, embolization and access technologies to develop new products that could address significant clinical needs cost effectively. The peripheral vasculature suffers from disorders that are very similar to those experienced in the neurovasculature that our products already successfully address. For example, weakening of the vascular walls can result in aneurysms, and blockages can form as the result of embolism or advanced atherosclerosis. Just as the disruption of blood flow to the brain has high mortality and morbidity, disruptions in the peripheral vasculature can also have serious adverse consequences. The peripheral vasculature also presents unique challenges that do not apply to interventional efforts in the brain. Many peripheral arteries and veins are significantly larger than those found in the brain and therefore have higher blood flow rates. More importantly, they must be able to accommodate larger pressure gradients and sustain structural integrity despite substantial movement and flexing of the organs and musculature that surround them. Imaging can also be more challenging as physicians have to view their equipment through many more layers of organs and tissue than in the brain. In 2012, we began investing further in research and development to evaluate and identify potential solutions to address significant clinical needs in the peripheral vasculature. Our products for the treatment of peripheral vascular disease focus on peripheral vascular embolization; vessel occlusion; and peripheral vascular thrombectomy. Peripheral Embolization Ruby Coil System After completing research and development focusing on the specific requirements of the peripheral embolization market, we launched our Ruby Coil System for use in the peripheral vascular market in 2013 The Ruby Coil System consists of detachable coils that are specifically designed for peripheral applications. The Ruby coils have a controlled mechanical detachment mechanism that permits the physician to deliver and reposition the coil until the final satisfactory position is reached before detachment. Compared to pushable coils, this minimizes costly complications like embolizing unintended vessels. 9 Table of Contents The Ruby Coil System is used in a variety of clinical applications, including active extravasations, or the escape of blood into surrounding tissue; selective embolization in patients with visceral aneurysms; exclusion of branches prior to chemoembolization and radioembolization; embolization in patients with gastrointestinal bleeding; embolization of branches prior to stent graft procedures; procedures after stent grafting in patients with persistent type II endoleaks and sac enlargement; treatment of patients with varicocele and pelvic congestion syndrome; high flow arterial venous malformations; post trans intrahepatic shunt placement; balloon retrograde transvenous obliteration; and exclusion of hepatic branches prior to liver resection. We believe our Ruby Coil System offers specialist physicians a differentiated, cost effective solution in the treatment of peripheral embolization patients. Lantern After entering the peripheral embolization market, we developed the Lantern Microcatheter to address unmet clinical needs. We received 510(k) clearance for the Lantern Microcatheter in December 2015. The Lantern Microcatheter is offered in a variety of lengths and tip shapes relevant to peripheral vascular procedures. The distal segment of Lantern is visual under fluoroscopy to aid in the navigation and visualization of the microcatheter during procedures. POD (Penumbra Occlusion Device) We developed POD, our peripheral vascular occlusion device, to address a specific need in the peripheral embolization market to rapidly and precisely occlude a target vessel. Current options for vessel occlusion in the periphery are limited, either requiring multiple devices or difficult to deliver vascular plugs. Microcatheter deliverable devices, such as coils, are not ideally suited for vessel embolization due to their tendency to migrate with antegrade flow and generally require the deployment of several devices to achieve occlusion. Vascular plug technology for larger peripheral vessels requires access with large diagnostic catheters or even larger bore sheaths. Additionally, these devices often require the placement of adjunctive devices, such as coils, to achieve complete occlusion. Our POD device utilizes technology that delivers both variable sizing and variable softness to provide a single device solution for rapid and precise embolization of the target vessel. We received 510(k) clearance for POD in July 2014. Unlike conventional vascular plugs, our POD technology enables the occlusive device to be delivered through a microcatheter. Additionally, a single POD can occlude a range of vessel diameters, reducing the need for sophisticated measurement prior to embolization. Our POD technology leverages the key features of a dedicated vessel embolization device to improve ease of use. These include microcatheter deliverability; instant detachment; immediate and precise anchoring; a single device to treat a range of vessel diameters; and dense occlusion in a short segment. The technology achieves this range of features through the design of a distal anchoring segment, thereby immediately anchoring the device in a range of vessel diameters. The proximal segment of the POD achieves dense occlusion by packing a softer, smaller diameter segment tightly behind the anchored portion. Once POD is deployed, it can be detached instantly with the sterile detachment handle. 10 Table of Contents POD Packing Coil We introduced the POD Packing Coil in January 2016 as a complementary device for use with our other peripheral embolization products. It is uniquely designed to pack densely behind RUBY Coils and POD to occlude arteries and veins throughout the peripheral vasculature including aneurysms. Peripheral Thrombectomy Indigo System Our Indigo System, which we launched in 2014, was designed for continuous aspiration mechanical thrombectomy (CAT), leveraging the success of the Penumbra System in ischemic stroke. The Indigo System is designed to remove clots in the peripheral arteries and veins. Our Indigo System family of products and accessories is an easy to use thrombectomy system that is powerful, highly trackable, and suited to a wide range of clot morphology. The principal comp1nts include Continuous Aspiration Mechanical Thrombectomy Catheters are the foundation of the system and are ideally suited to reach anatomy below the knee. Much like our MAX and ACE catheters, the CAT catheters are robust, durable, trackable and suited for the peripheral anatomy. The initial launch of the Indigo System included our CAT5 catheter and the device made for more distal access, CAT3, which is able to reach the distal peripheral vessels of the upper and lower extremities. On May 26, 2015, we received FDA clearance for CAT6 and CAT8, 2 larger sizes of the Indigo System, as well as to market the Indigo System for use in both the peripheral arterial and venous systems. Indigo Separator enables the peripheral interventionalist to remove a difficult to aspirate clot from the CAT catheter. In the peripheral vessels, clots often form in long segments, and are more resistant to traditional aspiration techniques. The Indigo System with the Separator enables a wide range of clot morphology to be removed from the body. While conclusions should not be drawn from initial results and further results may prove to be worse or inconclusive, we have demonstrated in clinical settings that the Indigo System with the Separator can remove clots that were resistant to hours of revascularization attempts with other technologies and thrombolytic agents. Penumbra Aspiration Pump is the power source that provides the aspirating suction force to remove waste, such as blood and clots. Research and Development We direct our research efforts towards the development of clinical therapies that expand the therapeutic alternatives available to specialist physicians and improve upon our existing product offerings. Our research and development team has a track record of product innovation and significant product improvements. Since inception, we have introduced 16 products brands in either the U. S., international markets, or both. Our research and development expenses totaled $18.0 million , $15.6 million and $14.1 million for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. We believe our ability to rapidly develop innovative products is in large part attributable to the fully integrated product innovation process that we have implemented, and the management philosophy behind that process. In addition, we have recruited and retained engineers with both significant experience in the development of medical devices as well as engineers directly from undergraduate and graduate programs that have become immediately productive within our development process. We have a pipeline of products in various stages of development that are expected to provide additional commercial opportunities. All of our research and development efforts are based at our campus in Alameda, California. Manufacturing We currently maintain 1 manufacturing facility at our campus in Alameda, California, which, together with our research and development space, totals 180,000 square feet. The manufacturing facilities run 2 eight hour shifts per weekday. In addition, in December 2015, we signed a lease for an additional 99,568 square feet of space at our campus in Alameda, giving us capacity to increase production, and allowing us to expand adjacent to our current facilities. We currently produce substantially all of our products in house. Our rigorous quality control management programs have earned us a number of quality related manufacturing designations. Our manufacturing facilities are EN ISO 13485 compliant with ISO 13485 2003 certification achieved in 2005. In 2007, we achieved compliance with MDD standards, allowing our products to be CE marked. We use annual internal audits, combined with external audits by regulatory agencies to help ensure strong quality control practices. An internal, on going staff training and education program contributes to our quality assurance program; training is documented and considered part of the employee evaluation process. 11 Table of Contents Sales and Marketing We have dedicated substantial resources to establish a direct sales capability in the U. S., most of Europe, Canada and Australia, which we have complemented with distributors in Japan and certain other international markets. We have regulatory clearance to sell our neurovascular access, ischemic stroke, neurovascular embolization, peripheral embolization and peripheral thrombectomy products in 2 of our 3 major markets, the U. S. and Europe, except that 3D has been cleared in Europe but not the U. S. In our third major market, Japan, we have regulatory clearance to sell our ischemic stroke, neurovascular embolization and peripheral embolization products. The only access product that has received regulatory clearance in Japan is PXSLIM. 3D, Ruby Coil, ACE 64 and Indigo System have not received regulatory clearance in Japan. Our Penumbra Coil 400 products are also used for peripheral embolization in Japan, and have received regulatory clearance for that use in that market. Liberty Stent has not yet received regulatory clearance anywhere. We believe our global presence enables us to capitalize on the markets for neuro and peripheral vascular devices that exist outside of the U. S. We currently sell our products to hospitals in the U. S. through our dedicated salesforce in 2 target end markets, neuro and peripheral vascular. Our sales representatives and sales managers generally have substantial medical device experience and market our products directly to a variety of specialist physicians engaged in the treatment of neurovascular and peripheral vascular disorders, who are the end users of our products and significantly influence hospital buying decisions relating to medical devices. We are focused on developing strong relationships with specialist physicians and devote significant resources to training and educating physicians in the use and benefits of our products. The principal specialist physicians in our 2 target end markets include Neuro Interventional neuroradiologists, neurosurgeons and interventional neurologists. Peripheral vascular Interventional radiologists and vascular surgeons. In addition to our direct sales organizations, we work with distributors in certain geographic areas where we have determined that selling through distributors is likely to be more effective. The largest market where we sell our products through a distributor is Japan, with Medico Hirata Inc. Our direct sales have been, and we anticipate will continue to represent, a majority of our revenues. In 2015, direct sales accounted for approximately 837% of our revenue, with the balance generated by independent distributors that sell our products outside of the U. S. Backlog We typically accept and ship orders on the day purchase orders are received or the next business day. Furthermore, if requested, we generally permit customers to cancel or reschedule without penalty. As a result, we do not believe that our backlog at any particular time is material, nor is it a reliable indication of future revenue. Reimbursement In the U. S., hospitals are the purchasers of our products. Hospitals in turn bill various third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and private health insurance plans, for the total healthcare services required to treat the patient. Government agencies, private insurers and other payors determine whether to provide coverage for a particular procedure and to reimburse hospitals for inpatient treatment at a fixed rate based on the diagnosis related group (DRG) as determined by the U.S. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). The fixed rate of reimbursement is based on the procedure performed, and is unrelated to the specific medical device used in that procedure. Medicare rates for the same or similar procedures vary due to geographic location, nature of facility in which the procedure is performed (i.e., teaching or community hospital) and other factors. While private payors vary in their coverage and payment policies, most look to coverage and payment by Medicare as a benchmark by which to make their own decisions. Some payors may deny reimbursement if they determine that the device used in a treatment was unnecessary, not cost effective, or used for a non approved indication. We cannot assure you that government or private third party payors will cover and reimburse the procedures using our products in whole or in n the future or that payment rates will be adequate. Outside the U. S., market acceptance of medical devices depends partly upon the availability of reimbursement within the prevailing healthcare payment system. Reimbursement levels vary significantly by country, and by region within some countries. Reimbursement is obtained from a variety of sources, including government sponsored and private health insurance plans, and combinations of both. A small number of countries may require us to gather additional clinical data before recognizing coverage and reimbursement for our products. It is our intent to complete the requisite clinical studies and obtain coverage and reimbursement approval in countries where it makes economic sense to do so. 12 Table of Contents The increased emphasis on managed healthcare in the U. S. and on country and regional pricing and reimbursement controls in international markets will put additional pressure on product pricing, reimbursement and usage, which may adversely affect our product sales and results of operations. These pressures can arise from rules and practices of insurers and managed care organizations, judicial decisions and governmental laws and regulations related to Medicare, Medicaid and healthcare reform, medical device reimbursement policies and pricing in general. Our ability to achieve market acceptance or significant sales volume will depend in large part on the availability of coverage and the level of reimbursement for procedures performed using our products under healthcare payment systems in such markets. All third party reimbursement programs, whether government funded or insured commercially, whether in the U. S. or internationally, are developing increasingly sophisticated methods of controlling health care costs through prospective reimbursement and capitation programs, group purchasing, redesign of benefits, second opinions required prior to major surgery, careful review of bills, encouragement of healthier lifestyles and exploration of more cost effective methods of delivering health care. These types of programs and legislative or regulatory changes to reimbursement policies could potentially limit the amount which healthcare providers may be willing to pay for medical devices. Competition The medical device industry is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. We compete with a number of manufacturers and distributors of neurovascular and peripheral vascular medical devices. Our most notable competitors are Boston Scientific, Johnson & Johnson, Medtronic, Stryker and Terumo. All of these competitors are large, well capitalized companies with significantly more market share and resources than we have. As a consequence, they are able to spend more on product development, marketing, sales and other product initiatives than we can. We also compete with a number of smaller medical device companies that have single products or a limited range of products. Some of our competitors have significantly greater name recognition; broader or deeper relations with healthcare professionals, customers and third party payors; more established distribution ne2rks; additional lines of products and the ability to offer rebates or bundle products to offer greater discounts or other incentives to gain a competitive advantage; greater experience in conducting research and development, manufacturing, clinical trials, marketing and obtaining regulatory clearance or approval for products; and greater financial and human resources for product development, sales and marketing and patent litigation. We compete primarily on the basis that our products are able to treat patients with neurovascular and peripheral vascular diseases and disorders safely and effectively. Our continued success depends on our ability to develop innovative, proprietary products that can cost effectively address significant clinical needs; continue to innovate and develop scientifically advanced technology; obtain and maintain regulatory clearances or approvals; demonstrate efficacy in Penumbra sponsored and third party clinical trials and studies; apply technology across product lines and markets; attract and retain skilled research and development and sales personnel; and cost effectively manufacture and successfully market and sell products. Intellectual Property Our success depends in part on our ability to protect our proprietary technology and intellectual property and operate without infringing the patents and other proprietary rights of third parties. We rely on a combination of patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright and other intellectual property rights and measures to protect our intellectual property rights that we consider important to our business. We also rely on know how and continuing technological innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. We do not have any material licenses to any technology or intellectual property rights. As of December 31, 2015 , we owned 20 issued patents globally, of which nine were U.S. patents. As of December 31, 2015 , we owned 38 pending patent applications, of which 15 were patent applications pending in the U. S. Subject to payment of required maintenance fees, annuities and other charges, nine of our issued patents are currently expected to expire between 13 Table of Contents 2024 and 2025; five of these patents relate to comp1nts of the Penumbra System and the Indigo System and 1 of these patents relates to methods performed by the Apollo System. An additional five of our issued patents, which relate to comp1nts of devices that have not been commercialized, are expected to expire between 2026 and 2027. The remaining seven of our issued patents, which relate to the comp1nts of the Penumbra Coil 400 and Ruby Coil, are currently expected to expire after 2027. Our issued patents relate to the following main areas mechanical thrombectomy, coil embolization, treatment of aneurysm and treatment of intracranial hemorrhage. Our pending patent applications relate primarily to the following five main areas mechanical thrombectomy, coil embolization, coronary atherectomy, blood filtration and treatment of patients with intracranial hemorrhage. Some of our pending patent applications pertain to comp1nts and methods of use associated with currently commercialized products. Our pending patent applications may not result in issued patents and we can give no assurance that any patents that have issued or might issue in the future will protect our current or future products or provide us with any competitive advantage. See the section titled Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property for additional information. Additionally, we own or have rights to trademarks or trade names that are used in our business and in conjunction with the sale of our products, including nine U.S. trademark registrations and six foreign trademark registrations as of December 31, 2015 . Included in the registered trademarks is a mark with our company name and logo. We also seek to protect our proprietary rights through a variety of methods, including confidentiality agreements and proprietary information agreements with suppliers, employees, consultants and others who may have access to our proprietary information. Government Regulation United States Our products are medical devices subject to extensive and ongoing regulation by the FDA under the FD&C Act and its implementing regulations, as well as other federal and state regulatory bodies in the U. S. and comparable authorities in other countries under other statutes and regulations. The laws and regulations govern, among other things, product design and development, pre clinical and clinical testing, manufacturing, packaging, labeling, storage, record keeping and reporting, clearance or approval, marketing, distribution, promotion, import and export, and post marketing surveillance. Failure to comply with applicable requirements may subject a device and or its manufacturer to a variety of administrative sanctions, such as issuance of Warning letters, import detentions, civil m1tary penalties, and or judicial sanctions, such as product seizures, injunctions and criminal prosecution. FDA Premarket Clearance and Approval Requirements Each medical device we seek to commercially distribute in the U. S. will require either a prior 510(k) clearance, unless it is exempt, or a premarket approval from the FDA. Medical devices are classified into 1 of 3 classes Class I, Class II or Class III depending on the degree of risk associated with each medical device and the extent of control needed to provide reasonable assurance of safety and effectiveness. Class I devices are deemed to be low risk and are subject to the general controls of the FD&C Act, such as provisions that relate to adulteration; misbranding; registration and listing; notification, including repair, replacement, or refund; records and reports; and good manufacturing practices. Most Class I devices are classified as exempt from premarket notification under Section 510(k) of the FD&C Act, and therefore may be commercially distributed without obtaining 510(k) clearance from the FDA., Class II devices are subject to both general controls and special controls to provide reasonable assurance of safety and effectiveness. Special controls include performance standards, postmarket surveillance, patient registries, and guidance documents. A manufacturer may be required to submit to the FDA a premarket notification requesting permission to commercially distribute some Class II devices. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device, are placed in Class III. A Class III device cannot be marketed in the U. S. unless the FDA approves the device after submission of a premarket approval application ( PMA ). However, there are some Class III devices for which the FDA has not yet called for a PMA. For these devices, the manufacturer must submit a premarket notification and obtain 510(k) clearance in order to commercially distribute these devices. The FDA can also impose sales, marketing or other restrictions on devices in order to assure that they are used in a safe and effective manner. 510(k) Clearance Pathway When a 510(k) clearance is required, we must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that our proposed device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device, which is a previously cleared and legally marketed 510(k) device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976. By regulation, a premarket notification must be submitted to the FDA at least 90 days before we intend to distribute a device. As a practical matter, clearance often takes significantly longer. To demonstrate substantial equivalence, the manufacturer must show that the proposed device has the same 14 Table of Contents intended use as the predicate device, and it either has the same technological characteristics, or different technological characteristics and the information in the premarket notification demonstrates that the device is equally safe and effective and does not raise different questions of safety and effectiveness. The FDA may require further information, including clinical data, to make a determination regarding substantial equivalence. If the FDA determines that the device, or its intended use, is not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared device or use, the FDA will place the device into Class III. There are 3 types of 510(k)s traditional, special and abbreviated. Special 510(k)s are for devices that are modified and the modification needs a new 510(k) but does not affect the intended use or alter the fundamental scientific technology of the device. Abbreviated 510(k)s are for devices that conform to a recognized standard. The special and abbreviated 510(k)s are intended to streamline review, and the FDA intends to process special 510(k)s within 30 days of receipt. Premarket Approval Pathway A premarket approval application must be submitted to the FDA for Class III devices for which the FDA has required a PMA. The premarket approval application process is much more demanding than the 510(k) premarket notification process. A premarket approval application must be supported by extensive data, including but not limited to technical, preclinical, clinical trials, manufacturing and labeling to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction reasonable evidence of safety and effectiveness of the device. After a premarket approval application is submitted, the FDA has 45 days to determine whether the application is sufficiently complete to permit a substantive review and thus whether the FDA will file the application for review. The FDA has 180 days to review a filed premarket approval application, although the review of an application generally occurs over a significantly longer period of time and can take up to several years. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of the information already provided. Also, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. Although the FDA is not bound by the advisory panel decision, the panel recommendations are important to the FDA overall decision making process. In addition, the FDA may conduct a preapproval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with the Quality System Regulation ( QSR) . The agency also may inspect 1 or more clinical sites to assure compliance with FDA regulations. Upon completion of the PMA review, the FDA may (i) approve the PMA which authorizes commercial marketing with specific prescribing information for 1 or more indications, which can be more limited than those originally sought; (ii) issue an approvable letter which indicates the FDA belief that the PMA is approvable and states what additional information the FDA requires, or the post approval commitments that must be agreed to prior to approval; (iii) issue a not approvable letter which outlines steps required for approval, but which are typically more 1rous than those in an approvable letter, and may require additional clinical trials that are often expensive and time consuming and can delay approval for months or even years; or (iv) deny the application. If the FDA issues an approvable or not approvable letter, the applicant has 180 days to respond, after which the FDA review clock is reset. Clinical Trials Clinical trials are almost always required to support premarket approval and are sometimes required for 510(k) clearance. In the U. S., for significant risk devices, these trials require submission of an application for an Investigational Device Exemption( IDE) to the FDA. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specific number of patients at specified study sites. During the trial, the sponsor must comply with the FDA IDE requirements for investigator selection, trial monitoring, reporting, and recordkeeping. The investigators must obtain patient informed consent, rigorously follow the investigational plan and study protocol, control the disposition of investigational devices, and comply with all reporting and recordkeeping requirements. Clinical trials for significant risk devices may not begin until the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the appropriate institutional review boards, or IRBs, at the clinical trial sites. An IRB is an appropriately constituted group that has been formally designated to review and monitor medical research involving subjects and which has the authority to approve, require modifications in, or disapprove research to protect the rights, safety and welfare of human research subjects. A nonsignificant risk device does not require FDA approval of an IDE; however, the clinical trial must still be conducted in compliance with various requirements of FDA IDE regulations and be approved by an IRB at the clinical trials sites. We, the FDA or the IRB at each site at which a clinical trial is being performed may withdraw approval of a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the benefits or a failure to comply with FDA or IRB requirements. Even if a trial is completed, the results of clinical testing may not demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the device, may be equivocal or may otherwise not be sufficient to obtain approval or clearance of the product. 15 Table of Contents Sponsors of clinical trials of devices are required to register with clinicaltrials.gov, a public database of clinical trial information. Information related to the device, patient population, phase of investigation, study sites and investigators, and other aspects of the clinical trial is made public as part of the registration. Ongoing Regulation by the FDA Even after a device receives clearance or approval and is placed on the market, numerous regulatory requirements apply. These include establishment registration and device listing; the QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation, and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the manufacturing process; labeling regulations and the FDA prohibitions against the promotion of products for un cleared, unapproved or off label uses, and other requirements related to promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufactures report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or if their device malfuncti1d and the device or a similar device marketed by the manufacturer would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; corrections and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufactures report to the FDA field corrections or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by a device or to remedy a violation of the FD&C Act that may present a risk to health; and post market surveillance regulations, which apply to certain class II or III devices when necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device. After a device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, will require a new clearance or possibly a premarket approval. The FDA requires each manufacturer to make this determination initially, but the FDA can review any such decision and can disagree with a manufacturer determination. If the FDA disagrees with our determination not to seek a new 510(k) clearance, the FDA may retroactively require us to seek 510(k) clearance or possibly a premarket approval. The FDA could also require us to cease marketing and distribution and or recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or premarket approval is obtained. Also, in these circumstances, we may be subject to significant regulatory fines and penalties. Some changes to an approved PMA device, including changes in indications, labeling, or manufacturing processes or facilities, require submission and FDA approval of a new PMA or PMA supplement, as appropriate, before the change can be implemented. Supplements to a PMA often require the submission of the same type of information required for an original PMA, except that the supplement is generally limited to that information needed to support the proposed change from the device covered by the original PMA. The FDA uses the same procedures and actions in reviewing PMA supplements as it does in reviewing original PMAs. FDA regulations require us to register as a medical device manufacturer with the FDA. Additionally, the California Department of Health Services ( CDHS) requires us to register as a medical device manufacturer within the state. Because of this, the FDA and the CDHS inspect us on a routine basis for compliance with the QSR. These regulations require that we manufacture our products and maintain related documentation in a prescribed manner with respect to manufacturing, testing and control activities. We have underg1 and expect to continue to undergo regular QSR inspections in connection with the manufacture of our products at our facilities. Further, the FDA requires us to comply with various FDA regulations regarding labeling. Failure by us or by our suppliers to comply with applicable regulatory requirements can result in enforcement action by the FDA or state authorities, which may include any of the following sanctions warning or untitled letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; customer notifications, voluntary or mandatory recall or seizure of our products; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production; delay in processing submissions or applications for new products or modifications to existing products; withdrawing approvals that have already been granted; and criminal prosecution. The Medical Device Reporting laws and regulations require us to provide information to the FDA when we receive or otherwise become aware of information that reasonably suggests our device may have caused or contributed to a death or 16 Table of Contents serious injury as well as a device malfunction that likely would cause or contribute to death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur. In addition, the FDA prohibits an approved device from being marketed for off label use. The FDA and other agencies actively enforce the laws and regulations prohibiting the promotion of off label uses, and a company that is found to have improperly promoted off label uses may be subject to significant liability, including substantial m1tary penalties and criminal prosecution. Newly discovered or developed safety or effectiveness data may require changes to a product labeling, including the addition of new warnings and contraindications, and also may require the implementation of other risk management measures. Also, new government requirements, including those resulting from new legislation, may be established, or the FDA policies may change, which could delay or prevent regulatory clearance or approval of our products under development. We are also subject to other federal, state and local laws, and regulations relating to safe working conditions, laboratory, and manufacturing practices. Regulatory Inspections We are subject to periodic inspections by the FDA and other regulatory bodies related to the regulatory requirements that apply to medical devices designed and manufactured, and clinical trials sponsored, by us. When the FDA conducts an inspection, the inspectors will identify any deficiencies they believe exist in the form of a notice of inspectional observations, or Form FDA 483 If we receive a notice of inspectional observations or deficiencies from the FDA following an inspection, we likely will be required to respond in writing, and may be required to undertake corrective and preventive actions or other actions in order to address the FDA concerns. Failure to address the FDA concerns may result in the issuance of a warning letter or other enforcement or administrative actions. From June 24, 2015 to July 15, 2015, the FDA conducted an inspection of our records relating to certain investigational sites for 2 different clinical trials, and from July 30, 2015 to August 4, 2015, the FDA conducted an inspection of our Quality System. At the conclusion of the first inspection, a Form FDA 483 was issued with 1 observation related to the failure to ensure proper monitoring at five of the investigational sites reviewed. At the conclusion of the second inspection, a Form FDA 483 was also issued with 1 observation relating to our procedures for completing and documenting effectiveness checks for Corrective and Preventative Action (CAPA). We provided timely responses to both Form FDA 483s, implemented changes to our clinical trial monitoring and CAPA procedures, and updated the FDA on the steps taken. On November 6, 2015, we received a letter from the FDA regarding the CAPA related Form 483, noting that they had received our responses and would review the adequacy of the actions taken at our next inspection. On December 21, 2015, we received a letter from the FDA regarding the monitoring related Form 483 indicating that our responses and actions appeared adequate to address the observation and noting that they may verify the actions taken during a future inspection. However, the FDA may conclude in subsequent inspections that we have not adequately responded to its observations or carried out all necessary corrective actions, and could take action against us without further notice. Action by the FDA against us could result in m1tary fines or require us to take further corrective actions, which could be expensive and time consuming to complete and could impose additional burdens and expenses, and could even require us to discontinue our investigational studies. European Union Our products are regulated in the European Union as medical devices per the European Union Directive (93 42 EEC), also known as the Medical Device Directive. An authorized third party, also called a Notified Body, must approve products for CE marking. The CE mark is contingent upon continued compliance to the applicable regulations and the quality system requirements of the ISO 13485 standard. Other Regions Most major markets have different levels of regulatory requirements for medical devices. Modifications to the cleared or approved products may require a new regulatory submission in all major markets. The regulatory requirements, and the review time, vary significantly from country to country. Products can also be marketed in other countries that have minimal requirements for medical devices. Fraud and Abuse and Other Healthcare Regulation Anti Kickback Statute We are subject to various federal and state healthcare laws, including, but not limited to, anti kickback laws. In particular, the federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons or entities from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving or paying any remuneration, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in exchange for or to induce either the referral of an individual for the furnishing or arranging for a good or service, or for the purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or recommending any good, facility, service or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part under 17 Table of Contents federal healthcare programs, such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The federal Anti Kickback Statute is broad and prohibits many arrangements and practices that are lawful in businesses outside of the healthcare industry. The term remuneration expressly includes kickbacks, bribes, or rebates and also has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including, for example, gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, payments of cash, waivers of payments, ownership interests and providing anything at less than its fair market value. There are a number of statutory exceptions and regulatory safe harbors protecting certain business arrangements from prosecution under the federal Anti Kickback Statute. These statutory exceptions and safe harbors set forth provisions that, if all their applicable requirements are met, will assure healthcare providers and other parties that they may not be prosecuted under the federal Anti Kickback Statute. The failure of a transaction or arrangement to fit precisely within 1 or more applicable statutory exceptions or safe harbors does not necessarily mean that it is illegal or that prosecution will be pursued. However, conduct and business arrangements that do not fully satisfy all requirements of an applicable safe harbor may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities and will be evaluated on a case by case basis based on a cumulative review of all of its facts and circumstances. Additionally, the intent standard under the federal Anti Kickback Statute was amended under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Affordable Care Act), to a stricter standard such that a person or entity no longer needs to have actual knowledge of the statute or specific intent to violate it in order to have committed a violation. The Affordable Care Act provides that the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal Anti Kickback Statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the federal civil False Claims Act which is discussed below. Penalties for violations of the anti kickback statute include, but are not limited to, criminal, civil and or administrative penalties, damages, fines, disgorgement, individual imprisonment, possible exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid and other federal healthcare programs, and the curtailment or restructuring of operations. Various states have adopted laws similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, and some of these state laws may be broader in scope in that some of these state laws extend to all payors and may not contain safe harbors. Federal Civil False Claims Act. The federal civil False Claims Act prohibits, among other things, persons or entities from knowingly presenting or causing to be presented a false or fraudulent claim to, or the knowing use of false statements to obtain payment from or approval by, the federal government. Suits filed under the federal civil False Claims Act, known as qui tam actions, can be brought by any individual on behalf of the government. These individuals, sometimes known as relators or, more commonly, as whistleblowers, may share in any amounts paid by the entity to the government in fines or settlement. The number of filings of qui tam actions has increased significantly in recent years, causing more healthcare companies to have to defend a case brought under the federal civil False Claim Act. If an entity is determined to have violated the federal civil False Claims Act, it may be required to pay up to 3 times the actual damages sustained by the government, plus civil penalties for each separate false claim. Various states have adopted laws similar to the federal civil False Claims Act, and many of these state laws are broader in scope and apply to all payors, and therefore, are not limited to only those claims submitted to the federal government. Federal Civil M1tary Penalties Statute. The federal Civil M1tary Penalties Statute, among other things, imposes fines against any person who is determined to have presented, or caused to be presented, claims to a federal healthcare program that the person knows, or should know, is for an item or service that was not provided as claimed or is false or fraudulent. Sunshine Act. The Affordable Care Act also included a provision, commonly referred to as the Sunshine Act. This provision requires that any manufacturer of a covered device that provides payment or other transfer of value to a physician or teaching hospital, or to a third party at the request of a physician or teaching hospital, must submit to CMS information about the payment or other transfer of value annually, with the reported information to be made public on a searchable website. Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) created several new federal crimes, including healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private third party payors. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. In addition, HIPAA and its implementing regulations established uniform standards for certain covered entities, which are healthcare providers, health plans and healthcare clearinghouses, as well as their business associates, governing the conduct of specified electronic healthcare transactions and protecting the security and privacy of protected health information. The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, commonly referred to as the economic stimulus package, included an expansion of HIPAA privacy and security standards called the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (HITECH). Among other things, HITECH created four new tiers of civil m1tary penalties and gave state 18 Table of Contents attorneys general new authority to file civil actions for damages or injunctions in federal courts to enforce the federal HIPAA laws and seek attorneys fees and costs associated with pursuing federal civil actions. Employees As of December 31, 2015 , we had approximately 1,100 employees worldwide. N1 of our employees are represented by a collective bargaining agreement and we have never experienced a work stoppage. We believe our employee relations are good. Facilities We maintain a 180,000 square feet research and development and manufacturing facility in 3 buildings at our campus in Alameda, California. The leases for these 3 buildings expire in 2029, subject to our option to renew any or all 3 leases for an additional ten years. In December 2015, we signed a lease for an additional 99,568 square feet of space (plus an additional space of 15,882 square feet that may be delivered to us at the landlord option prior to May 1, 2016) in 3 adjacent buildings located in our campus in Alameda, California. From time to time during the ten year period following the initial commencement date of the new lease, if any space in any of the buildings or in a fourth building located in the same business park as our campus becomes vacant, that space will be added to the lease at the then current base monthly rental rate. The maximum additional space that could be added under this provision of the lease is 117,325 square feet. We have a right of first offer to lease any space that becomes available in the buildings or in the fourth building after the expiration of the ten year period following the initial commencement date, subject to the terms described in the new lease. The term of the new lease expires after fifteen years from the initial lease commencement date, subject to our option to renew the lease for up to 3 additional five year periods. We also lease office space in Berlin, Germany; Sydney, Australia; and Sao Paulo, Brazil. The offices in Berlin and Sydney support our direct sales operations in Europe and Australia, respectively, and the office in Sao Paulo supports our Latin America marketing efforts through our distribution partners. Legal Proceedings We were contacted in 2015 by the attorney for a potential product liability claimant who allegedly suffered injuries as a result of an aneurysm procedure in which the Penumbra Coil 400 was used. On February 19, 2016, a complaint for damages was filed on behalf of this claimant against Penumbra and the hospital involved in the procedure ( Montgomery v. Penumbra, Inc., et al., Case No. 16 2 04050 1 SEA, Superior Court of the State of Washington, King County) . The suit alleges liability primarily under the Washington Product Liability Act and seeks both compensatory and punitive damages without a specific damages claim. Counsel for the claimant previously indicated that he expects that a jury could award $35 million in damages were this matter to go to trial. This amount is substantially in excess of our insurance coverage. The hospital defendant has requested indemnification from Penumbra. As the litigation has been filed recently and the parties have not engaged in formal discovery, we are unable to assess the merits of the plaintiff case. We intend to vigorously defend the litigation, as we believe there will be substantial questions regarding causation, liability and damages. Additionally, from time to time, we are subject to claims and assessments in the ordinary course of business. We are not currently a party to any litigation matter that, individually or in the aggregate, is expected to have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations or cash flows. Available Information We make our Annual Reports on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K, and amendments to those reports, available free of charge at our website as soon as reasonably practicable after they have been filed with the SEC. Our website address is www.penumbrainc.com. Information on our website is not part of this report. The public may read and copy any materials we file with the SEC at the SEC Public Reference Room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, DC 20549. The public may obtain information of the Public Reference Room by calling the SEC at 1 800 SEC 0330. The SEC maintains a website that contains the materials we file with the SEC at www.sec.gov. 19 Table of Contents ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS. This Annual Report on Form 10 K contains forward looking information based on our current expectations. Because our business is subject to many risks and our actual results may differ materially from any forward looking statements made by or on behalf of us, this section includes a discussion of important factors that could affect our business, operating results, financial condition and the trading price of our common stock. You should carefully consider these risk factors, together with all of the other information included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K as well as our other publicly available filings with the SEC. Business Risks We have a limited operating history and may not be able to sustain or grow our profitability or generate positive cash flows from operations. We were founded in 2004 and did not generate any revenue until 2007. Moreover, while we have successfully developed, obtained regulatory clearance or approval for, and introduced a number of products in the neuro market since 2007, we first introduced products in the peripheral vascular and neurosurgical markets in 2013 and 2014, respectively. Accordingly, we only have a limited operating history upon which investors can evaluate our business and prospects, and this limited operating history may not be indicative of our future results. Since 2009, we have been generally profitable on an annual basis; however, we incurred operating losses in 2013 We can give no assurance that we will be profitable or cash flow positive in the future. Our general and administrative and sales and marketing expenses have increased, and we expect that they will continue to increase, to support our anticipated growth as well as the additional operational and reporting costs associated with being a public company. We have also expended significant amounts on research and development to develop and fund clinical testing of our products, and we expect to continue to do so. We also expend significant amounts on maintaining inventory levels of raw materials, comp1nts and finished products to meet anticipated customer demand. In addition, our coil products are sold on a consignment basis, which requires us to expend significant amounts on inventory that is placed at many customer locations. Our ability to sustain our growth and profitability and operate cash flow positive may be influenced by many factors, including our ability to achieve and maintain market acceptance of our products; unanticipated problems and additional costs relating to the development and testing of new products; our ability to introduce, manufacture at scale, build new inventory and commercialize new products; our ability to produce sufficient quantities of our products to meet demand and to smoothly transition to new products; the impact of competition; the timing and impact of market and regulatory developments; our ability to expand into new markets; pricing pressure from competitors; the availability and adequacy of third party reimbursement for procedures in which our products are used; and our ability to obtain and maintain adequate intellectual property protection for our products and technologies. If we encounter difficulties with any of the foregoing or unexpected expenses, it could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Our existing products may be rendered obsolete and we may be unable to effectively introduce and market new products or may fail to keep pace with advances in technology. The medical device market is characterized by rapidly advancing technology. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to anticipate technological advancements and competitive innovations and introduce new products to adapt to these advancements and innovations. To compete in the marketplace, we have made, and we must continue to make, substantial investments in new product development, whether internally through research and development or externally through licensing or acquisitions. We can give no assurance that we will be successful in identifying, developing or acquiring, and marketing new products or enhancing our existing products. In addition, we can give no assurance that new products or alternative treatment techniques developed by competitors will not render our current or future products obsolete or inferior, technologically or economically. The success of any new products that we develop or acquire depends on achieving and maintaining market acceptance. Market acceptance for our current and new products could be affected by a number of factors, including our ability to market and distribute our products effectively; the availability, perceived efficacy and pricing of alternative products from our competitors; 20 Table of Contents the development of new products or alternative treatments by others that render our products and technologies obsolete; the price, quality, effectiveness and reliability of our products; our customer service and reputation; our ability to convince specialist physicians to use our products on their patients; and the timing of market entry of new products or alternative treatments. Our competition may respond more quickly to new or emerging technologies or a changing clinical landscape, undertake more extensive marketing campaigns, have greater financial, marketing and other resources than us or be more successful in attracting potential customers and strategic partners. Given these factors, we cannot assure you that we will be able to continue or increase our level of success. Our failure to introduce new and innovative products in a timely manner, and our inability to maintain or grow the market acceptance of our existing products, could result in permanent write downs or write offs of our inventory and otherwise have a material and adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Delays in product introductions could adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. The medical device market is highly competitive and designs change often to adjust to shifting market preferences and other factors. Therefore, product life cycles are relatively short. As a result, any delays in our product launches may significantly impede our ability to enter or compete in a given market and may reduce the sales that we are able to generate from these products. We may experience delays in any phase of a product launch, including during research and development, clinical trials, regulatory review, manufacturing and marketing. Delays in product introductions could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. We face significant competition, and if we are unable to compete effectively, we may not be able to achieve or maintain significant market penetration or improve our results of operations. The medical device industry is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. We compete with a number of manufacturers and distributors of neuro and peripheral vascular devices. Our most notable competitors are Boston Scientific, Johnson & Johnson, Medtronic, Stryker and Terumo. All of these competitors are large, well capitalized companies with longer operating histories and significantly greater resources than us. We also compete with a number of smaller medical device companies that have a single product or a limited range of products. Our competitors may be able to spend more on product development, marketing, sales and other product initiatives, or be more focused in their spending and activities, than we can. Some of our competitors have significantly greater name recognition; broader or deeper relations with healthcare professionals, customers and third party payors; more established distribution ne2rks; additional lines of products and the ability to offer rebates or bundle products to offer greater discounts or other incentives to gain a competitive advantage; greater experience in conducting research and development, manufacturing, clinical trials, marketing and obtaining regulatory clearance or approval for products; and greater financial and human resources for product development, sales and marketing and patent litigation. We compete primarily on the basis that our products are able to treat patients with neurovascular and peripheral vascular diseases and disorders safely and effectively, with improved outcomes and procedural cost savings. Our continued success depends on our ability to develop innovative, proprietary products that can cost effectively address significant clinical needs; continue to innovate and develop scientifically advanced technology; obtain and maintain regulatory clearances or approvals; demonstrate efficacy in Penumbra sponsored and third party clinical trials and studies; apply technology across product lines and markets; attract and retain skilled research and development and sales personnel; and 21 Table of Contents cost effectively manufacture and successfully market and sell products. We cannot assure you that we will be able to compete effectively on the basis of these factors. Additionally, our competitors with greater financial resources could acquire or develop new technologies or products that effectively compete with our existing or future products. If we are unable to effectively compete, it would materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. Our future growth depends, in part, on our ability to further penetrate our current customer base and increase the frequency of use of our products by our customers. We will need to continue to make specialist physicians and other hospital staff aware of the benefits of our products to generate increased demand and frequency of use, and thus increase sales to our hospital customers. Although we are attempting to increase the number of patients treated with procedures that use our products through our established relationships and focused sales efforts, we cannot provide assurance that our efforts will increase the use of our products. If we are unable to increase the frequency of use of our products by specialist physicians, this could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Our future growth depends, in part, on significantly expanding our user base to include additional specialist physicians in both our existing and future target end markets. Currently, the primary users of our neuro products are neuro interventionalists who perform endovascular neuro interventions. We also began selling in the peripheral vascular market in 2013 with the introduction of our Ruby Coil and the neurosurgery market in 2014 with the introduction of our Apollo System, and we may enter new target end markets in the future. Our revenue growth will depend in part on our ability to convince specialist physicians in our existing and future target end markets of our products efficacy, to educate them in the proper use of our products and to sell our products to their affiliated hospitals. Convincing specialist physicians to use new products and to dedicate the time and energy necessary for adequate education in the use of our products is challenging, especially in new markets where treatments using our products are not established. Expanding our customer base in existing or new target end markets may require, among other things, additional clinical evidence supporting patient benefits, training in a manner to which we are not accustomed, or other resources that we do not readily have available or are not cost effective for us to provide. If we are unable to convert specialist physicians in existing or new target end markets to the use of our products, our sales growth will be limited, which could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. The marketing and sales of our products require a significant amount of time and expense and we may not have the resources to successfully market and sell our products, which would adversely affect our business and results of operations. The marketing and sales of our products requires us to invest in training and education and employ a salesforce that is large enough to interact with the specialist physicians who use our products. Entering new markets also requires a significant amount of time and expense in order to identify and establish relationships with key opinion leaders among the specialist physicians who may use our products in those markets. We may not have adequate resources to market and sell our products successfully against larger competitors. For example, when we began selling in the peripheral vascular market in 2013, we did not have a dedicated direct peripheral vascular sales team and our neuro sales team was required to dedicate a portion of its efforts to the sales of our peripheral vascular products. We subsequently expended significant sums to develop a direct salesforce focused on peripheral vascular product sales. If we do not have adequate resources to market and sell our products effectively, or cannot otherwise market and sell our products successfully, it could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Third party reimbursement may not be available or adequate for the procedures in which our products are used. Our ability to commercialize new products successfully in both the U. S. and international markets depends in part on the availability of, and hospitals ability to obtain, adequate levels of third party reimbursement for the procedures in which our products are used. In the U. S., the cost of medical care is funded, in substantial part, by government insurance programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, and private and corporate health insurance plans. Third party payors may deny reimbursement if they determine that a device used in a procedure has not received appropriate FDA or other governmental regulatory clearances or approvals, is not used in accordance with cost effective treatment methods as determined by the payor, or is experimental, unnecessary or inappropriate. Our ability to commercialize our products successfully will depend, in large part, on the extent to which adequate reimbursement levels for the cost of their use are obtained from government authorities, private health insurers and other organizations, such as health maintenance organizations. Further, healthcare in the U. S. and international markets is also being affected by economic pressure to contain reimbursement levels and costs. Changing reimbursement models could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. 22 Table of Contents We have generated a significant portion of our revenue from products that are used in connection with the treatment of neurovascular diseases, and our revenue and business prospects would be adversely affected if our neuro product sales were to decline. We have generated most of our revenue from our neurovascular products, including our Penumbra System, Penumbra Coil 400 and Neuron products. If any 1 or more of these products, or any successor products, were no longer available for sale in any key market because of regulatory, third party reimbursement or intellectual property issues or any other reason, or if 1 of our competitors introduced 1 or more products that specialist physicians believe are superior to our products, our revenue from these products would decline. A significant decline in our sales of neurovascular products could also negatively impact our financial condition and our ability to conduct product development activities, and therefore negatively impact our business prospects. We must maintain and further develop relationships with specialist physicians. If specialist physicians do not recommend and endorse, or use, our products or if our relationships with specialist physicians deteriorate, our products may not be accepted or maintain acceptance in the marketplace, which would adversely affect our business and results of operations. Our products are sold to hospitals for use by specialist physicians practicing at their facilities. In order for us to sell our products, specialist physicians must recommend and endorse them for the hospital to purchase them, and must use them in treating their patients to generate follow on sales. We may not obtain the necessary recommendations or endorsements for new products from specialist physicians, nor may we be able to maintain the current or future level of acceptance and usage of our products. Acceptance of our products depends on educating the medical community as to the distinctive characteristics, perceived benefits, safety, clinical efficacy and cost effectiveness of our products compared to products of our competitors or treatments that do not use our products, and on training specialist physicians in the proper application and use of our products. We invest in significant training and education of our sales representatives and specialist physicians to achieve market acceptance of our products, with no assurance of success. If we are not successful in obtaining and maintaining the recommendations or endorsements of specialist physicians for our products, if specialist physicians prefer our competitors products or other alternative treatments that do not use our products, or if our products otherwise do not gain or maintain market acceptance, our business could be adversely affected. In addition, the research, development, marketing and sales of our products are dependent, in part, upon our working relationships with specialist physicians. We rely on them to provide us with knowledge and feedback regarding our products and the marketing of our products. If we are unable to develop or maintain strong relationships with specialist physicians and receive their advice and input, the development and marketing of our products could suffer, which could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. We may not be able to achieve or maintain satisfactory pricing and margins for our products. Manufacturers of medical devices have a history of price competition, and we can give no assurance that we will be able to achieve satisfactory prices for our products or maintain prices at the levels we have historically achieved. If we are unable to achieve or maintain our prices, or if our costs increase and we are unable to offset such increase with an increase in our prices, our margins could erode and we may be unable to maintain profitable operations. We cannot be certain that we will be able to manufacture our products in high volumes at commercially reasonable costs. We currently maintain our manufacturing operations in buildings located at our campus in Alameda, California. We currently produce substantially all of our products at this facility, and we do not have redundant facilities. We may need to expend significant capital resources and increase the size of our manufacturing capabilities as we grow our business. We could, however, encounter problems related to capacity constraints; production yields; quality control; equipment availability; and shortages of qualified personnel. Our continuous product innovation limits our ability to identify and implement manufacturing efficiencies. Failure to do so may reduce our ability to manufacture our products at commercially reasonable costs. If we are unable to manufacture our products in high volumes at commercially reasonable costs, it could materially affect our ability to adequately increase production of our products and fulfill customer orders on a timely basis, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. 23 Table of Contents We are required to maintain high levels of inventory, which consume a significant amount of our working capital and could lead to permanent write downs or write offs of our inventory. We maintain a significant inventory of raw materials, comp1nts and finished goods, which subjects us to a number of risks and challenges. Our hospital customers typically maintain only small quantities of our products at their facilities, so as products are used, they order replacements that typically require prompt delivery. As a result, we must maintain sufficient levels of finished goods to permit rapid shipment of products following receipt of a customer order. In turn, we must also maintain a sufficient supply of raw materials and comp1nts inventory to permit rapid manufacturing and re stocking of finished goods. Furthermore, our coil inventory is supplied to hospital customers on a consignment basis, which means that it is classified as part of our inventory for financial reporting purposes but is maintained at the hospital location until it is used. We have built, and will continue to build, a significant inventory of coils in order to support the introduction of and to provide adequate consignment stock for our new and existing coil products. Maintaining a significant inventory of raw materials, comp1nts and finished goods, including coils, consumes a significant amount of our working capital. This working capital could be used for other purposes, such as research and development or sales and marketing activities. As we grow our business, we may need substantial additional capital to fund higher levels of inventory, which may materially adversely affect our liquidity or result in dilution to our stockholders if we sell additional equity securities or leverage if we raise debt capital to finance our working capital requirements. Maintaining a significant inventory of raw materials, comp1nts and finished goods, including coils, also subjects us to the risk of inventory excess and obsolescence, which may lead to a permanent write down or write off of our inventory. While in inventory, our comp1nts and finished goods may become obsolete, and we may over estimate the amount of inventory needed, which may lead to excessive inventory. In these circumstances, we would write down or write off our inventory, and we may be required to expend additional resources or be constrained in the amount of end product that we can produce. Furthermore, our products have a limited shelf life due to sterilization requirements, and part or all of a given product or comp1nt may expire, resulting in a decrease in value and potentially a permanent write down of our inventory. For example, we recorded write downs of $12 million , $19 million and $0.9 million for excess and obsolete inventory in 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively. In the event that a substantial portion of our inventory becomes excess or obsolete, it could materially adversely affect our results of operations. Defects or failures or alleged defects or failures associated with our products could lead to recalls, safety alerts or litigation, as well as significant costs and negative publicity. Manufacturing flaws, comp1nt failures, design defects, off label uses or inadequate disclosure of product related information could result in an unsafe condition or the injury or death of a patient. These problems could lead to a recall of, or issuance of a safety alert relating to, our products and result in significant costs, negative publicity and adverse competitive pressure. While we have had product recalls, they have all been voluntary, based on our own internal safety and quality monitoring and testing data, and n1 of our past product recalls has been material. The circumstances giving rise to recalls are, however, unpredictable, and any future recalls of existing or future products could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. The medical device industry has historically been subject to extensive litigation over product liability claims. There are high rates of mortality and other complications associated with some of the medical conditions suffered by the patients whom specialist physicians use our devices to treat, and we may be subject to product liability claims if our products cause, or merely appear to have caused, an injury or death. In addition, an injury or death that is caused by the activities of our suppliers, such as those that provide us with comp1nts and raw materials, or by an aspect of a treatment used in combination with our products, such as a complementary drug or anesthesia, may be the basis for a claim against us by patients, hospitals, health care providers or others purchasing or using our products, even if our products were not the actual cause of such injury or death. For example, a product liability lawsuit was recently filed against Penumbra by a claimant who allegedly suffered injuries as a result of an aneurysm procedure in which the Penumbra Coil 400 was used, see Legal Proceedings in , Item 3 of this Form 10 K. An adverse outcome involving 1 of our products could result in reduced market acceptance and demand for all of our products, and could harm our reputation and our ability to market our products in the future. In some circumstances, adverse events arising from or associated with the design, manufacture or marketing of our products could result in the suspension or delay of regulatory reviews of our premarket notifications or applications for marketing. Any of the foregoing problems could disrupt our business and have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. Although we carry product liability insurance in the U. S. and in other countries in which we conduct business, including for clinical trials and product marketing, we can give no assurance that such coverage will be available or adequate to satisfy any claims. Product liability insurance is expensive, subject to significant deductibles and exclusions, and may not be available on acceptable terms, if at all. If we are unable to obtain or maintain insurance at an acceptable cost or on acceptable terms with adequate coverage or otherwise protect against potential product liability claims, we could be exposed to significant liabilities. A product liability claim, recall or other claim with respect to uninsured liabilities or for amounts in excess of insured liabilities 24 Table of Contents could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Defending a suit, regardless of its merit or eventual outcome, could be costly, could divert management attention from our business and might result in adverse publicity, which could result in reduced acceptance of our products in the market, product recalls or market withdrawals. Our products are continually the subject of clinical trials conducted by us, our competitors, or other third parties, the results of which may be unfavorable, or perceived as unfavorable, and which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. As a part of the regulatory process of obtaining marketing clearance or approval for new products and new indications for existing products, as well as to provide specialist physicians with ongoing information regarding the efficacy of our products, we conduct and participate in numerous clinical trials with a variety of study designs, patient populations and trial endpoints. Our competitors and third parties also conduct clinical trials of our products without our participation. Unfavorable or inconsistent clinical data from existing or future clinical trials conducted by us, our competitors or third parties, or the market or regulators perception of clinical data, could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Our future success depends in part upon establishing an interventional stroke care pathway in the U. S. that integrates the use of endovascular thrombectomy into the treatment of ischemic stroke. The stroke care pathway in the U. S. generally begins with emergency responders who are responsible for transporting the patient to a hospital facility. With a small number of exceptions (such as for trauma), emergency responders in the U. S. generally operate under a protocol that transports patients to the nearest hospital, which decreases the likelihood that the patient will be transported to a stroke center that has a developed stroke team and an interventional approach to the treatment of stroke. Further, there is no agreed upon standard of care among physicians or hospitals regarding the treatment of ischemic stroke patients, and treatment protocols vary according to the particular hospital, often resulting in significant delays and gaps in patients being assessed for and receiving interventional treatment. The absence of a uniform protocol among hospitals and among physicians within the same hospital means that we have to educate each hospital and stroke center about protocols that integrate our products for the treatment of stroke. We believe that the stroke care system in the U. S. has not been historically geared towards interventional treatment of stroke due to the absence of clinical evidence that interventional techniques were effective. Our and our competitors ability to alter the existing stroke care pathway may depend on whether we and our competitors are successful in using recent positive clinical studies to convince specialist physicians that intervention yields superior clinical results relative to cases where intervention is not used. Establishing an interventional stroke pathway that integrates the use of interventional treatments, including our products, will depend upon many factors, including continuing to educate hospitals and specialist physicians about the clinical evidence supporting intervention, as well as the use, benefits and cost effectiveness of our products; improving the speed with which patients are assessed for and receive interventional treatments; and increasing the likelihood that patients are transported to a hospital or stroke center where interventional treatments are available. Even if these efforts are successful, it may be years before existing systems and care pathways are changed. These factors may make it difficult to grow our business. Any data that is gathered in the course of clinical trials may be significantly more favorable than the typical results achieved by practicing specialist physicians, which could negatively impact rates of adoption of our products. Even if the data collected from clinical trials indicates positive results, each specialist physician actual experience with our products will vary. Clinical trials often involve procedures performed by specialist physicians who are technically proficient and high volume users. Consequently, the results reported in clinical trials may be significantly more favorable than typical results of other users. If specialist physicians experiences indicate, or they otherwise believe, that our products are not as safe or effective as other treatment options with which they are more familiar, or clinical trial data indicates the same, adoption of our products may suffer, which could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Negative publicity regarding our products or marketing tactics by competitors could reduce demand for our products, which would adversely affect sales and our financial performance. We may experience, from time to time, negative exposure in clinical publications or in marketing campaigns of our competitors. Such publications or campaigns may present negative individual physician experience regarding the safety or 25 Table of Contents effectiveness of our products or may suggest our competitors products are superior to ours, based on studies or clinical trials conducted or funded by competitors or that involved competitive products. Our reputation and competitive position may also be harmed by other publicly available information suggesting that our products are not safe. For example, we file adverse event reports under Medical Device Reporting ( MDR) obligations with the FDA that are publicly available on the FDA website. We are required to file MDRs if our products may have caused or contributed to a serious injury or death or malfuncti1d in a way that could likely cause or contribute to a serious injury or death if it were to recur. Any such MDR that reports a significant adverse event could result in negative publicity and could harm our reputation and future sales. Our dependence on key suppliers puts us at risk of interruptions in the availability of our products, which could reduce our revenue and adversely affect our results of operations. In addition, increases in prices for raw materials and comp1nts used in our products could adversely affect our results of operations. We require the timely delivery of sufficient amounts of comp1nts and materials to manufacture our products. For reasons of quality assurance, cost effectiveness or availability, we procure certain raw materials and comp1nts from a single or limited number of suppliers. We generally acquire such raw materials and comp1nts through purchase orders placed in the ordinary course of business, and as a result we may not have a significant inventory of these materials and comp1nts and generally do not have any guaranteed or contractual supply arrangements with many of these suppliers. Our reliance on these suppliers subjects us to risks that could harm our business, including, but not limited to, difficulty locating and qualifying alternative suppliers. Our dependence on third party suppliers involves several other risks, including limited control over pricing, availability, quality and delivery schedules. Suppliers of raw materials and comp1nts may decide, or be required, for reasons beyond our control, to cease supplying raw materials and comp1nts to us or to raise their prices. Shortages of raw materials, quality control problems, production capacity constraints or delays by our suppliers could negatively affect our ability to meet our production requirements and result in increased prices for affected materials or comp1nts. We may also face delays, yield issues and quality control problems if we are required to locate and secure new sources of supply. While we have not experienced any to date, any material shortage, constraint or delay may result in delays in shipments of our products, which could materially adversely affect our results of operations. Increases in prices for raw materials and comp1nts used in our products could also materially adversely affect our results of operations. In addition, the FDA and regulators outside of the U. S. may require additional testing of any raw materials or comp1nts from new suppliers prior to our use of these materials or comp1nts. In the case of a device with clearance under Section 510(k) of the FD&C Act, referred to as a 510(k), we may be required to submit a new 510(k) if a change in a raw material or comp1nt supplier results in a change in a material or comp1nt supplied that is not within the 510(k) cleared device specifications. If we need to establish additional or replacement suppliers for some of these materials or comp1nts, our access to the materials or comp1nts might be delayed while we qualify such suppliers and obtain any necessary FDA approvals or clearances. Our suppliers may also be subject to regulatory inspection and scrutiny. Any adverse regulatory finding or action against those suppliers could impact their ability to supply us with raw materials and comp1nts for our products. Our corporate culture has contributed to our success, and if we cannot maintain this culture as we grow, we could lose the innovative approach, creativity, and teamwork fostered by our culture, and our business may be harmed. We believe that a critical contributor to our success has been our corporate culture, which we believe fosters innovation, teamwork, and a focus on execution, as well as facilitating critical knowledge transfer and knowledge sharing. As we grow, we may find it difficult to maintain these important aspects of our corporate culture, which could limit our ability to innovate and operate effectively. Any failure to preserve our culture could also negatively affect our ability to retain and recruit personnel or execute on our business strategy. If our facilities were to become inoperable, we would be unable to continue to develop and manufacture our products until we were able to restore full research, manufacturing and administrative capabilities at our facilities or secure a new facility, and as a result, our business would be harmed. We currently maintain our research and development, manufacturing and administrative operations in buildings located at our campus in Alameda, California, and we do not have redundant facilities. Alameda is situated on or near earthquake fault lines, and our facilities are built on filled land, which could be pr1 to liquefaction in a major earthquake. Should 1 or more of our buildings be significantly damaged or destroyed by natural or man made disasters, such as earthquakes, fires or other events, it could take months to relocate or rebuild, during which time our employees may seek other positions, our research, development and manufacturing would cease or be delayed and our products may be unavailable. Moreover, because of the time required to approve and license a manufacturing facility under FDA and non U.S. regulatory requirements, we may not be able to resume production on a timely basis even if we are able to replace production capacity in the event we lose manufacturing capacity. While we maintain property and business interruption insurance, such insurance has limits and would 26 Table of Contents only cover the cost of rebuilding and relocating and lost profits, but not losses we may suffer due to our products being replaced by competitors products. The inability to perform our research, development and manufacturing activities, combined with our limited inventory of raw materials and comp1nts and manufactured products, may cause specialist physicians to discontinue using our products or harm our reputation, and we may be unable to reestablish relationships with those specialist physicians in the future. Consequently, a catastrophic event at our facility could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. To successfully market and sell our products internationally, we must address a number of unique challenges applicable to international markets. For the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , we derived 316%, 339% and 34.4%, respectively, of our revenue from international sales. International sales are subject to a number of risks and challenges, including reliance on distributors; varying coverage and reimbursement policies, processes and procedures; difficulties in staffing and managing international operations from which sales are conducted; difficulties in penetrating markets in which our competitors products or alternative procedures that do not use our products are more established; reduced protection for intellectual property rights in some countries; export licensing requirements or restrictions, trade regulations and foreign tax laws; fluctuating foreign currency exchange rates; foreign certification, regulatory requirements and legal requirements; lengthy payment cycles and difficulty in collecting accounts receivable; customs clearance and shipping delays; pricing pressure in international markets; political and economic instability; and preference for locally produced products. If we are unable to successfully address these challenges, we may not be able to grow our international sales and our results of operations may suffer as a result. Over the long term, we intend to grow our business internationally and to do so, we will need to either spend substantial sums to expand or develop direct sales capabilities in existing and new geographic areas or generate additional sales through existing distributors or attract additional distributors. As a result of our international operations, we are required to comply with tax requirements in multiple jurisdictions, the scope and impact of which may be unclear. Moreover, tax authorities in jurisdictions in which we do business could disagree with tax positions that we take, including, for example, our inter company pricing policies, or could assert that we owe more taxes than we currently pay due to the level and nature of our activities in such jurisdictions. We rely on our distributors to market and sell our products in certain international markets. We have established a direct sales capability in the U. S., most of Europe, Canada and Australia, which we have complemented with distributors in Japan and certain other international markets. Sales to distributors represented 16.3% and 17.7% of our revenue in 2015 and 2014 respectively. In addition, sales to our Japanese distributor, Medico Hirata Inc., represented approximately 10.2% of our revenue in 2015 . Our success outside of the U. S., most of Europe, Canada and Australia depends largely upon marketing arrangements with distributors, in particular their sales expertise and their relationships with specialist physicians and affiliated hospitals in their geographic areas. Distributors may terminate their relationship with us, sell competitive products or devote insufficient sales efforts or other resources to our products. We do not control our distributors, and they may not be successful in implementing our marketing plans. In addition, many of our distributors initially obtain and maintain foreign regulatory approval for the sale of our products in their respective countries, and their efforts in obtaining and maintaining regulatory approval may not be as robust as we desire or expect. Our failure to maintain our existing relationships with our distributors, or our failure to recruit and retain additional skilled distributors in existing or new international markets, could have an adverse effect on our operations. If current or future distributors do not perform adequately, or if we lose a significant distributor, such as our Japanese distributor, we may not be able to maintain 27 Table of Contents existing levels of international revenue or realize expected long term international revenue growth. We have also experienced turnover with some of our distributors in the past that has adversely affected sales in the countries in which those distributors operate. Similar occurrences could happen in the future. Most of our customer relationships outside of the U. S. are with governmental entities, and we could be materially adversely affected by violations of the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions. The U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act ( FCPA) and similar anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non U.S. officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Because of the predominance of government sponsored healthcare systems around the world, most of our customer relationships outside of the U. S. are with governmental entities, and physicians practicing in those systems are considered government officials. Therefore, our sales to these entities are therefore subject to such anti bribery laws. Our policies mandate compliance with these anti bribery laws. We operate in many parts of the world that have experienced governmental corruption, and in certain circumstances strict compliance with anti bribery laws may be at variance with local customs and practices. Despite our training and compliance programs, our internal control policies and procedures may not always protect us from reckless or criminal acts committed by our employees, distributors or agents. Violations of the FCPA or other anti bribery laws, or allegations of such violations, could disrupt our business and materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Foreign currency exchange rates may adversely affect our results. We are exposed to the effects of changes in foreign currency exchange rates, and we have not historically hedged our foreign currency exposure. Approximately 316%, 339% and 34.4% of our revenue for the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , respectively, were derived from sales in non U.S. markets, and we expect sales from non U.S. markets to continue to represent a significant portion of our revenue. For direct sales in our international markets, we are paid by our customers in their local currency, which is primarily euros. For sales to distributors in our international markets, we are paid in either U.S. dollars, euros or Japanese yen. Therefore, when the U.S. dollar strengthens relative to the euro, yen or other local currency, as it has in recent periods, our U.S. dollar reported revenue from non U.S. dollar denominated sales will decrease, or we will need to increase our non U.S. dollar denominated prices, which may not be commercially practical. Conversely, when the U.S. dollar weakens relative to the euro, yen or other local currency, our U.S. dollar reported expenses from non U.S. dollar denominated operating costs will increase. Changes in the relative values of currencies occur regularly and, in some instances, could materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. We have experienced rapid growth in recent periods, and if we fail to manage our growth effectively, our business and results of operations may suffer. We have significantly expanded our overall business, research and development, customer base, product portfolio, employee headcount and operations in recent periods. We have also established new operations in other countries. We have increased our total number of full time employees from 468 as of December 31, 2013 , to approximately 1,100 as of December 31, 2015 . Our expansion has placed, and our expected future growth will continue to place, a significant strain on our managerial, operational, product development, sales and marketing, administrative, financial and other resources. More systems, facilities, processes and management employees are needed to allow us to continue to grow successfully. We also plan to continue to increase our salesforce. Our experience has been that it takes at least six months, and often longer, before new sales personnel generate enough sales to cover their costs, resulting in increased costs without offsetting revenue during periods in which we are increasing the size of our salesforce. To meet anticipated demand for our products, we will also have to obtain additional space, buy additional equipment and hire additional research and development and manufacturing employees, including quality control personnel and other personnel involved in the production process. If we are unable to manage our growth successfully, it could have a material and adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. We have experienced rapid initial growth in the endovascular treatment of stroke and we believe this market may not continue to grow sustainably at these rates. Our revenue increased from $88.8 million to $125.5 million to $186.1 million in the years ended December 31, 2013, 2014 and 2015, respectively. Revenue increased in 2014 and 2015 partially as a result of the presentation and publication of the MR. CLEAN trial results in the fourth quarter of 2014, and the presentation and publication of additional trial results in the first quarter of 2015, each of which supported endovascular treatment of stroke and opened up additional opportunities for our products as the standard of care in treatment of stroke, resulting in increased procedures for us and our competitors. We do not expect that the rate of market growth will continue at this pace in the future. 28 Table of Contents We have experienced rapid growth in the market for our peripheral vascular products and we expect this growth to be more gradual in the future. Revenue from our peripheral vascular products increased $25.4 million, or 1319%, to $44.7 million in 2015, from $19.3 million in 2014. Our peripheral embolization and peripheral thrombectomy products have experienced strong volume growth, primarily due to the focused efforts of our dedicated peripheral vascular salesforce, which was established in the second half of 2014, and further market penetration of our products. As we continue to grow and scale our peripheral vascular business, we expect that our growth rates will be more gradual. We depend on key personnel to operate our business and develop our products, and if we are unable to retain, attract and integrate qualified personnel, our ability to develop and successfully grow our business could be harmed. We believe that our future success is highly dependent on the contributions of our executive officers, particularly our chief executive officer, as well as our ability to attract and retain highly skilled and experienced sales and marketing, technical and other personnel in the U. S. and in international markets. Each of these persons efforts will be critical to us as we continue to develop our products and business. If we were to lose 1 or more of our key employees, including to competitors, we may experience difficulties in competing effectively, developing our products and implementing our business strategies. Our research and development and sales and marketing programs depend on our ability to attract and retain highly skilled technicians, engineers and salespeople. We may not be able to attract or retain qualified employees in the future due to the intense competition for qualified personnel among life science businesses, particularly in the San Francisco Bay Area, where our corporate headquarters, research and development and manufacturing facilities are located. If we are not able to identify, recruit and retain highly qualified personnel, we may experience constraints that will adversely affect our ability to support our research, development, manufacturing and sales programs, and ultimately our ability to compete. If we are unable to identify, recruit and retain qualified salespeople, there could be a delay or decline in the adoption of our products. If key personnel were to leave Penumbra, either to join our competitors or otherwise, we may not be able to attract and retain equally qualified personnel to replace them. We depend on information technology systems to operate our business, and issues with maintaining, upgrading or implementing these systems, or a cyber attack or other breach of these systems could have a material adverse effect on our business. We rely on the efficient and uninterrupted operation of information technology systems to process, transmit and store electronic information in our day to day operations. All information technology systems are vulnerable to damage or interruption from a variety of sources. As our business has grown in size and complexity, the growth has placed, and will continue to place, significant demands on our information technology systems. To effectively manage this growth, our information systems and applications require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain, protect, enhance and upgrade existing systems and develop and implement new systems to keep pace with changing technology and our business needs. For example, we are in the process of evaluating an upgrade to our existing enterprise resource planning (ERP) software system to perform various functions, and we may implement other upgrades or new systems in the near future. These upgrades or system changes entail certain risks, including difficulties with changes in business processes that could disrupt our operations, such as our ability to track orders and timely ship products, manage our supply chain and aggregate financial and operational data. During transitions we may continue to rely on legacy information systems, which may be costly or inefficient, while the implementation of new initiatives may not achieve the anticipated benefits and may divert management's attention from other operational activities, negatively affect employee morale, or have other unintended consequences. Delays in integration or disruptions to our business from implementation of new or upgraded systems could have a material adverse impact on our financial condition and operating results. Additionally, if we are not able to accurately forecast expenses and capitalized costs related to system upgrades and changes, this may have an adverse impact on our financial condition and operating results. In addition, our information technology systems are vulnerable to a cyber attack, malicious intrusion, breakdown, destruction, loss of data privacy or other significant disruption. Any such successful attacks could result in the theft of intellectual property or other misappropriation of assets, or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. Cyber attacks are becoming more sophisticated and frequent, and our systems could be the target of malware and other cyber attacks. We have invested in our systems and the protection of our data to reduce the risk of an intrusion or interruption, and we monitor our systems on an ongoing basis for any current or potential threats. We can give no assurances that these measures and efforts will prevent interruptions or breakdowns. If the information we rely upon to run our businesses were to be found to be inaccurate or unreliable, if we fail to maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity effectively, if we fail to develop and implement new or upgraded systems to meet our business needs in a timely manner, or if we fail to anticipate, plan for or manage significant disruptions to these systems, our competitive position could be harmed, we could have operational disruptions, we could lose 29 Table of Contents existing customers, have difficulty preventing, detecting, and controlling fraud, have disputes with customers, specialist physicians and other health care professionals, have regulatory sanctions or penalties imposed or other legal problems incur increased operating and administrative expenses, lose revenues as a result of a data privacy breach or theft of intellectual property or suffer other adverse consequences, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Cost containment efforts of our customers, purchasing groups and governmental organizations could have a material adverse effect on our sales and profitability. In an effort to reduce costs, many hospitals within the U. S. have become members of Group Purchasing Organizations (GPOs) and Integrated Delivery Ne2rks (IDNs). GPOs and IDNs negotiate pricing arrangements with medical device companies and distributors and offer the negotiated prices to affiliated hospitals and other members. GPOs and IDNs typically award contracts on a category by category basis through a competitive bidding process. Bids are generally solicited from multiple providers with the intention of driving down pricing or reducing the number of vendors. Due to the highly competitive nature of the GPO and IDN contracting processes, we may not be able to obtain or maintain contract positions with major GPOs and IDNs. Furthermore, the increasing leverage of organized buying groups may reduce market prices for our products, thereby reducing our profitability. While having a contract with a GPO or IDN for a given product category can facilitate sales to members of that GPO or IDN, such contract positions can offer no assurance that any level of sales will be achieved, as sales are typically made pursuant to purchase orders. Even when a provider is the sole contracted supplier of a GPO or IDN for a certain product category, members of the GPO or IDN generally are free to purchase from other suppliers. Furthermore, GPO and IDN contracts typically are terminable without cause by the GPO or IDN upon 60 to 90 days notice. Accordingly, although we have multiple contracts with many major GPOs and IDNs, the members of such groups may choose to purchase from our competitors due to the price or quality offered by such competitors, which could result in a decline in our sales and profitability. The successful use of our products depends, in part, on our ability to educate specialist physicians in the proper use of our products, which may be more complex than competitive products or alternative treatments that do not use our products. If we are unable to educate specialist physicians in the proper use of our products, we may experience a high risk of product liability. The successful use of our products depends, in part, on our ability to educate specialist physicians in the proper use of our products, which may be more complex than competitive products or alternative treatments that do not use our products. We educate specialist physicians on the proper techniques in using our products to achieve the intended outcome. However, our products may be more complicated to operate than competitive products or alternative treatments that do not use our products. In the event that specialist physicians perceive that our products are complex relative to alternative products or established treatments that do not use our products, we may have difficulty gaining or increasing adoption of our products. Further, we may be unable to provide adequate education on the use of our products to specialist physicians, and some specialist physicians may not be willing to invest the time required to become properly educated on the use of our products. If we are unable to educate specialist physicians to properly use our products, this may lead to inadequate demand for our products and materially adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. If we do not adequately educate specialist physicians on the use of our products, and our products are used incorrectly during procedures, we may also be subject to claims against us by such specialist physicians, their hospitals or their patients. Our business, including our reputation, may consequently be adversely affected by any litigation that may occur based on error in the use of our products, and such litigation could also materially adversely affect our results of operations, financial condition or cash flows. Regulatory Risks We are subject to stringent domestic and foreign medical device regulation, which may impede the approval or clearance process for our products, hinder our development activities and manufacturing processes and, in some cases, result in the recall or seizure of previously approved or cleared products. Our products, development activities and manufacturing processes are subject to extensive and rigorous regulation by the FDA and by comparable agencies in foreign countries and by other regulatory agencies and governing bodies. Manufacturers of medical devices such as us must comply with certain regulations that cover the composition, labeling, testing, clinical study, manufacturing, packaging and distribution of medical devices. In addition, medical devices must receive FDA clearance or approval before they can be commercially marketed in the U. S.. The FDA may require testing and surveillance programs to monitor the effects of cleared or approved products that have been commercialized and can prevent or limit further marketing of a product based on the results of these post marketing programs. Furthermore, most major markets for medical devices outside the U. S. require clearance, approval or compliance with certain standards and requirements before a product can be 30 Table of Contents commercially marketed. The process of obtaining marketing approval or clearance from the FDA and foreign regulatory agencies for new products could take a significant period of time, require the expenditure of substantial resources, involve rigorous pre clinical and clinical testing, require changes to our products and result in limitations on the indicated uses of our products. We cannot provide assurance that we will receive the required approval or clearance from the FDA and foreign regulatory agencies for future products on a timely basis. Results from pre clinical studies and early clinical trials may not allow us to predict results in later stage testing. We cannot be certain that our future clinical trials will demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of any of our future products or will result in clearance or approval to market any of these products. The failure to receive approval or clearance for significant new products on a timely basis could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. The FDA also conducts periodic inspections of our facilities to determine compliance with both the FDA QSR requirements and or MDR regulations. Product approvals or clearances by the FDA can be withdrawn, and new product approvals or clearances by the FDA and foreign regulatory bodies can be delayed, due to failure to comply with regulatory requirements or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following initial approval or clearance of a product. The failure to comply with regulatory requirements or the discovery of previously unknown problems with a product or manufacturer could result in fines, delays or suspensions of regulatory approvals or clearances, seizures or recalls of products (with the attendant expenses and adverse competitive impact), the banning of a particular device, an order to replace or refund the cost of any device previously manufactured or distributed, operating restrictions and criminal prosecution, as well as decreased sales as a result of negative publicity and product liability claims, all of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. The implementation of healthcare reform in the U. S. could have a material adverse effect on our business. In March 2010, the Affordable Care Act was enacted into law in the U. S.. The Affordable Care Act includes provisions that, among other things, reduce and or limit Medicare reimbursement, require all individuals to have health insurance (with limited exceptions) and impose new and or increased taxes. Specifically, the law imposed a 23% excise tax on the sale in the U. S. of certain medical devices by a manufacturer, producer or importer of such devices starting after December 31, 2012 While this tax has been suspended for a 2 year period commencing January 1, 2016, it could be reinstated. The Affordable Care Act also reduces Medicare and Medicaid payments to hospitals and clinical laboratories, which could reduce medical procedure volumes and impact the demand for our products or the prices at which we sell them. While this legislation is intended to expand health insurance coverage to uninsured persons in the U. S., the impact of any overall increase in access to healthcare on sales of our products remains uncertain. Various healthcare reform proposals have also emerged at the state level. The impact of the Affordable Care Act and these proposals could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. If we modify our FDA cleared products, we may need to seek and obtain new clearances, which, if not granted, would prevent us from selling our modified products or require us to redesign our products. A comp1nt of our strategy is to continue to modify and upgrade our products that have been cleared by the FDA. The FDA requires device manufacturers to make a determination of whether or not a modification requires a clearance; however, the FDA can review a manufacturer decision not to submit for additional clearances. Any modifications to an FDA cleared device that would significantly affect its safety or effectiveness or that would constitute a major change in its intended use would require a new 510(k) clearance or possibly a premarket approval. We may not be able to obtain additional 510(k) clearances or premarket approvals for new products or for modifications to, or additional indications for, our existing products in a timely fashion, or at all. We also cannot provide any assurance that the FDA will agree with our decisions not to seek clearances for particular device modifications. Delays in obtaining future clearances would adversely affect our ability to introduce new or enhanced products in a timely manner, which in turn would harm our revenue and future profitability. We have made modifications to our products in the past and may make additional modifications in the future that we believe do not or will not require additional clearances. If the FDA disagrees, and requires new clearances or approvals for any modifications, and we fail to obtain such approvals or clearances or fail to secure approvals or clearances in a timely manner, we may be required to recall and to stop the manufacturing and marketing of the modified device until we obtain FDA approval or clearance, and we may be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties, all of which could harm our results of operations and require us to redesign our products. We may not receive necessary foreign regulatory approvals or clearances or otherwise comply with foreign regulations. For the years ended December 31, 2015 , 2014 and 2013 , sales outside the U. S. accounted for approximately 316%, 339% and 34.4%, respectively, of our total sales, and we expect this percentage to increase in future years. Foreign regulatory bodies have established varying regulations. Specifically, the European Union has promulgated rules that require that medical device products receive the right to affix the CE mark, an international symbol of adherence to quality assurance standards and compliance with applicable European medical device directives. Although we have received CE markings for all of the products we currently sell in the European Union, we can give no assurance that we will be able to obtain European Union 31 Table of Contents approval for any of our future products. Our inability or failure, or the inability or failure of our international distributors, to comply with varying foreign regulations or the imposition of new regulations could restrict or, in certain countries, result in the prohibition of the sale of our products, and thereby adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, our profitability from our international operations may be limited by risks and uncertainties related to economic conditions in these regions, foreign currency fluctuations, regulatory and reimbursement approvals, competitive offerings, infrastructure development, rights to intellectual property and our ability to implement our overall business strategy. Any significant changes in the competitive, political, legal, regulatory, reimbursement or economic environment where we conduct international operations may have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. We may not be able to meet regulatory quality requirements applicable to our manufacturing process. We are required to register with the FDA as a device manufacturer and as a result, we are subject to periodic inspection by the FDA for compliance with the FDA QSR requirements, which require manufacturers of medical devices to adhere to certain regulations, including testing, quality control and documentation procedures. In addition, the federal MDR regulations require us to provide information to the FDA whenever there is evidence that reasonably suggests that a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or has malfuncti1d, and if the malfunction were to recur, it would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Compliance with applicable regulatory requirements is subject to continual review and is rigorously monitored through periodic inspections by the FDA. In the European Community, we are required to maintain certain International Organization for Standardization (ISO) certifications in order to sell products and we undergo periodic inspections by notified bodies to obtain and maintain these certifications. Some foreign countries, most notably Japan and Brazil, have similar requirements or may require inspections of our manufacturing facilities before approving a product for sale in their country. Some of our suppliers are subject to the same or similar scrutiny. If we or our suppliers fail to adhere to QSR, ISO or similar requirements, this could delay production of our products and lead to fines, difficulties in obtaining regulatory clearances or approvals, recalls or other consequences, which could in turn have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. We are subject to periodic inspections by the FDA and other regulatory bodies related to regulatory requirements that apply to medical devices designed and manufactured, and clinical trials sponsored, by us. We recently received notices of inspectional observations or deficiencies from the FDA, which require us to undertake corrective and preventive actions or other actions in order to address the FDA concerns, which could be expensive and time consuming to complete and could impose additional burdens and expenses. We are subject to periodic inspections by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. If we receive a notice of inspectional observations or deficiencies from the FDA following an inspection, we may be required to undertake corrective and preventive actions or other actions in order to address the FDA concerns, which could be expensive and time consuming to complete and could impose additional burdens and expenses. Failure to adequately address the FDA concerns could expose us to enforcement and administrative actions. From June 24, 2015 to July 15, 2015, the FDA conducted an inspection of our records relating to certain investigational sites for 2 different clinical trials, and from July 30, 2015 to August 4, 2015, the FDA conducted an inspection of our Quality System. At the conclusion of the first inspection, a Form FDA 483 was issued with 1 observation related to the failure to ensure proper monitoring at five of the investigational sites reviewed. At the conclusion of the second inspection, a Form FDA 483 was also issued with 1 observation relating to our procedures for completing and documenting effectiveness checks for Corrective and Preventative Action (CAPA). We provided timely responses to both Form FDA 483s, implemented changes to our clinical trial monitoring and CAPA procedures, and updated the FDA on the steps taken. On November 6, 2015, we received a letter from the FDA regarding the CAPA related Form 483, noting that they had received our responses and would review the adequacy of the actions taken at our next inspection. On December 21, 2015, we received a letter from the FDA regarding the monitoring related Form 483 indicating that our responses and actions appeared adequate to address the observation and noting that they may verify the actions taken during a future inspection. However, the FDA may conclude in subsequent inspections that we have not adequately responded to its observations or carried out all necessary corrective actions, and could take action against us without further notice. Action by the FDA against us could result in m1tary fines or require us to take further corrective actions, which could be expensive and time consuming to complete and could impose additional burdens and expenses, and could even require us to discontinue our investigational studies. We are subject to healthcare fraud and abuse regulations that could result in significant liability, require us to change our business practices and restrict our operations in the future. We are subject to various federal, state and local laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, including anti kickback and false claims laws. Violations of these laws are punishable by criminal or civil sanctions, including substantial fines, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid. These laws and regulations are wide ranging and subject to changing interpretation and application, which could restrict our sales or marketing 32 Table of Contents practices. Furthermore, since many of our customers rely on reimbursement from Medicare, Medicaid and other governmental programs to cover a substantial portion of their expenditures, our exclusion from such programs as a result of a violation of these laws could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. The FDA and other regulatory agencies strictly regulate the promotional claims that may be made about medical devices. If we are found to have improperly promoted our products for off label uses, we may become subject to significant fines and other liability. The FDA and other regulatory agencies strictly regulate the promotional claims that may be made about medical devices. For example, devices cleared under section 510(k) cannot be marketed for any intended use that is outside of the FDA substantial equivalence determination for such devices. Physicians nevertheless may use our products on their patients in a manner that is inconsistent with the intended use cleared by the FDA. If we are found to have promoted such off label uses, we may become subject to significant government fines and other related liability. The federal government has levied large civil and criminal fines against companies for alleged improper promotion and has enjoined several companies from engaging in off label promotion. The FDA has also requested that companies enter into consent decrees or permanent injunctions under which specified promotional conduct is changed or curtailed. Our operations are subject to environmental, health and safety laws and regulations, with which compliance may be costly. Our business is subject to federal, state, and local laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment, worker health and safety and the use, management, storage, and disposal of hazardous substances and wastes. Failure to comply with these laws and regulations may result in substantial fines, penalties or other sanctions. In addition, environmental laws and regulations could require us to pay for environmental remediation and response costs, or subject us to third party claims for personal injury, natural resource or property damage, relating to environmental contamination. Liability may be imposed whether or not we knew of, or were responsible for, such environmental contamination. The cost of defending against environmental claims, of compliance with environmental, health and safety regulatory requirements or of remediating contamination could materially adversely affect our business, assets or results of operations and, consequently, amounts available for distribution to our stockholders. Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property We rely on a variety of intellectual property rights, and if we are unable to maintain or protect our intellectual property, our business and results of operations will be harmed. Our commercial success will depend, in part, on our ability to obtain and maintain intellectual property protection for our products and related technologies both in the U. S. and elsewhere, successfully defend our intellectual property rights against third party challenges and successfully enforce our intellectual property rights to prevent third party infringement. While we rely primarily upon a combination of patents, trademarks and trade secret protection, as well as nondisclosure, confidentiality and other contractual agreements to protect the intellectual property related to our brands, products and other proprietary technologies, protection derived from patents is relatively limited. The process of obtaining patent protection is expensive and time consuming, and we may not be able to prosecute all necessary or desirable patent applications at a reasonable cost or in a timely manner. We may choose not to seek patent protection for certain innovations or products and may choose not to pursue patent protection in certain jurisdictions, and under the laws of certain jurisdictions, patents or other intellectual property rights may be unavailable or limited in scope and, in any event, any patent protection we obtain may be limited. As a result, some of our products are not, and in the future may not be, protected by patents. We generally apply for patents in those countries where we intend to make, have made, use or sell products and where we assess the risk of infringement to justify the cost of seeking patent protection. However, we do not seek protection in all countries where we sell products and we may not accurately predict all the countries where patent protection would ultimately be desirable. If we fail to timely file a patent application in any such country or major market, we may be precluded from doing so at a later date. Competitors may use our technologies in jurisdictions where we have not obtained patent protection to develop their own products and, further, may export otherwise infringing products to territories in which we have patent protection that may not be sufficient to terminate infringing activities. Furthermore, we cannot guarantee that any patents will be issued from any pending or future owned or licensed patent applications, or if any current or future patents will provide us with any meaningful protection or competitive advantage. Even if issued, existing or future patents may be challenged, including with respect to ownership, narrowed, invalidated, held unenforceable or circumvented, any of which could limit our ability to prevent competitors and other third parties from developing and marketing similar products or limit the length of terms of patent protection we may have for our products and technologies. Other companies may also design around technologies we have patented, licensed or developed. In addition, the issuance of a patent does not give us the right to practice the patented invention. Third parties may have blocking patents that could prevent us from marketing our products or practicing our own patented technology. 33 Table of Contents The patent positions of medical device companies can be highly uncertain and involve complex legal, scientific and factual questions for which important legal principles remain unresolved. The standards that the U. S. Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO) and its foreign counterparts use to grant patents are not always applied predictably or uniformly. Changes in either the patent laws, implementing regulations or the interpretation of patent laws may diminish the value of our rights. The legal systems of certain countries do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the U. S., and many companies have encountered significant problems in protecting and defending such rights in foreign jurisdictions. Because patent applications in the U. S., Europe and many other jurisdictions are typically not published until 18 months after filing, or in some cases not at all, and because publications of discoveries in scientific literature lag behind actual discoveries, we cannot be certain that we were the first to make the inventions claimed in our issued patents or pending patent applications, or that we were the first to file for protection of the inventions set forth in our patents or applications. We can give no assurance that all of the potentially relevant art relating to our patents and patent applications has been found; overlooked prior art could be used by a third party to challenge the validity, enforceability and scope of our patents or prevent a patent from issuing from a pending patent application. As a result, we may not be able to obtain or maintain protection for certain inventions. Therefore, the validity, enforceability and scope of our patents in the U. S., Europe and in other countries cannot be predicted with certainty and, as a result, any patents that we own or license may not provide sufficient protection against our competitors. Third parties may challenge any existing patent or future patent we own or license through adversarial proceedings in the issuing offices or in court proceedings, including as a response to any assertion of our patents against them. In any of these proceedings, a court or agency with jurisdiction may find our patents invalid and or unenforceable, or even if valid and enforceable, insufficient to provide protection against competing products and services sufficient to achieve our business objectives. We may be subject to a third party pre issuance submission of prior art to the USPTO, or reexamination by the USPTO if a third party asserts a substantial question of patentability against any claim of a U.S. patent we own or license. The adoption of the Leahy Smith America Invents Act (Leahy Smith Act) in September 2011 established additional opportunities for third parties to invalidate U.S. patent claims, including inter parties review and post grant review proceedings. Outside of the U. S., patents we own or license may become subject to patent opposition or similar proceedings, which may result in loss of scope of some claims or the entire patent. In addition, such proceedings are very complex and expensive, and may divert our management attention from our core business. If any of our patents are challenged, invalidated, circumvented by third parties or otherwise limited or expire prior to the commercialization of our product candidates, and if we do not own or have exclusive rights to other enforceable patents protecting our products or other technologies, competitors and other third parties could market products and use processes that are substantially similar to, or superior to, ours and our business would suffer. The degree of future protection for our proprietary rights is uncertain because legal means afford only limited protection and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to gain or keep a competitive advantage. For example others may be able to develop products that are similar to, or better than, ours in a way that is not covered by the claims of our patents; we might not have been the first to make the inventions covered by our patents or pending patent applications; we might not have been the first to file patent applications for these inventions; any patents that we obtain may not provide us with any competitive advantages or may ultimately be found invalid or unenforceable; or we may not develop additional proprietary technologies that are patentable. We may file lawsuits or initiate other proceedings to protect or enforce our patents or other intellectual property rights, which could be expensive, time consuming and unsuccessful. Competitors may infringe our issued patents or other intellectual property. To counter infringement or unauthorized use, we may be required to file infringement claims, which can be expensive and time consuming. Any claims we assert against perceived infringers could provoke these parties to assert counterclaims against us alleging that we infringe their intellectual property. In addition, in a patent infringement proceeding, a court may decide that a patent of ours is invalid or unenforceable, in whole or in part, construe the patent claims narrowly or refuse to stop the other party from using the technology at issue on the grounds that our patents do not cover the technology in question. An adverse result in any litigation proceeding could put 1 or more of our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly, which could adversely affect our competitive business position, business prospects and financial condition. 34 Table of Contents Our commercial success depends significantly on our ability to operate without infringing upon the intellectual property rights of third parties. The medical device industry is subject to rapid technological change and substantial litigation regarding patent and other intellectual property rights. Our competitors in both the U. S. and abroad, many of which have substantially greater resources and have made substantial investments in patent portfolios and competing technologies, may have applied for or obtained or may in the future apply for and obtain, patents that will prevent, limit or otherwise interfere with our ability to make, use and sell our products. Numerous third party patents exist in the fields relating to our products, and it is difficult for industry participants, including us, to identify all third party patent rights relevant to our products and technologies. Moreover, because some patent applications are maintained as confidential for a certain period of time, we cannot be certain that third parties have not filed patent applications that cover our products and technologies. Patents could be issued to third parties that we may ultimately be found to infringe. Third parties may have or obtain valid and enforceable patents or proprietary rights that could block us from developing product candidates using our technology. Our failure to obtain or maintain a license to any technology that we require may materially harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. Furthermore, we would be exposed to a threat of litigation. From time to time, we may be party to, or threatened with, litigation or other proceedings with third parties, including non practicing entities, who allege that our products, comp1nts of our products and or proprietary technologies infringe, misappropriate or otherwise violate their intellectual property rights. The types of situations in which we may become a party to such litigation or proceedings include we or our collaborators may initiate litigation or other proceedings against third parties seeking to invalidate the patents held by those third parties or to obtain a judgment that our products or processes do not infringe those third parties patents; we or our collaborators may participate at substantial cost in International Trade Commission proceedings to abate importation of products that would compete unfairly with our products; if our competitors file patent applications that claim technology also claimed by us or our licensors, we or our licensors may be required to participate in interference, derivation or opposition proceedings to determine the priority of invention, which could jeopardize our patent rights and potentially provide a third party with a dominant patent position; if third parties initiate litigation claiming that our processes or products infringe their patent or other intellectual property rights, we and our collaborators will need to defend against such proceedings; if third parties initiate litigation or other proceedings seeking to invalidate patents owned by or licensed to us or to obtain a declaratory judgment that their product or technology does not infringe our patents or patents licensed to us, we will need to defend against such proceedings; we may be subject to ownership disputes relating to intellectual property, including disputes arising from conflicting obligations of consultants or others who are involved in developing our products; and if a license to necessary technology is terminated, the licensor may initiate litigation claiming that our processes or products infringe or misappropriate their patent or other intellectual property rights and or that we breached our obligations under the license agreement, and we and our collaborators would need to defend against such proceedings. These lawsuits and proceedings, regardless of merit, are time consuming and expensive to initiate, maintain, defend or settle, and could divert the time and attention of managerial and technical personnel, which could materially adversely affect our business. Any such claim could also force use to do 1 or more of the following incur substantial m1tary liability for infringement or other violations of intellectual property rights, which we may have to pay if a court decides that the product or technology at issue infringes or violates the third party rights, and if the court finds that the infringement was willful, we could be ordered to pay treble damages and the third party attorneys fees; pay substantial damages to our customers or end users to discontinue use or replace infringing technology with non infringing technology; stop manufacturing, selling, using, exporting or licensing the product or technology incorporating the allegedly infringing technology or stop incorporating the allegedly infringing technology into such product or technology; obtain from the owner of the infringed intellectual property right a license, which may require us to pay substantial upfront fees or royalties to sell or use the relevant technology and which may not be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all; 35 Table of Contents redesign our products and technology so they do not infringe or violate the third party intellectual property rights, which may not be possible or may require substantial m1tary expenditures and time; enter into cross licenses with our competitors, which could weaken our overall intellectual property position; lose the opportunity to license our technology to others or to collect royalty payments based upon successful protection and assertion of our intellectual property against others; find alternative suppliers for non infringing products and technologies, which could be costly and create significant delay; or relinquish rights associated with 1 or more of our patent claims, if our claims are held invalid or otherwise unenforceable. Some of our competitors may be able to sustain the costs of complex intellectual property litigation more effectively than we can because they have substantially greater resources. In addition, intellectual property litigation, regardless of its outcome, may cause negative publicity, adversely impact prospective customers, cause product shipment delays, or prohibit us from manufacturing, marketing or otherwise commercializing our products and technology. Any uncertainties resulting from the initiation and continuation of any litigation could have a material adverse effect on our ability to raise additional funds or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. In addition, we may indemnify our customers and distributors against claims relating to the infringement of intellectual property rights of third parties related to our products. Third parties may assert infringement claims against our customers or distributors. These claims may require us to initiate or defend protracted and costly litigation on behalf of our customers or distributors, regardless of the merits of these claims. If any of these claims succeed, we may be forced to pay damages on behalf of our customers, suppliers or distributors, or may be required to obtain licenses for the products they use. If we cannot obtain all necessary licenses on commercially reasonable terms, our customers may be forced to stop using our products. Furthermore, because of the substantial amount of discovery required in connection with intellectual property litigation, there is a risk that some of our confidential information could be compromised by disclosure during this type of litigation. There could also be public announcements of the results of hearings, motions or other interim proceedings or developments. If securities analysts or investors perceive these results to be negative, it could have a material adverse effect on the price of our common stock. The occurrence of any of these events may have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. Changes in patent law could diminish the value of patents in general, thereby impairing our ability to protect our existing and future products. Recent patent reform legislation could increase the uncertainties and costs surrounding the prosecution of our patent applications and the enforcement or defense of our issued patents. The Leahy Smith Act includes a number of significant changes to U.S. patent law. These include provisions that affect the way patent applications are prosecuted, redefine prior art, and may also affect patent litigation. The USPTO developed new regulations and procedures to govern administration of the Leahy Smith Act, including switching the U. S. patent system from a first to invent system to a first to file system. Under a first to file system, assuming the other requirements for patentability are met, the first inventor to file a patent application generally will be entitled to the patent on an invention regardless of whether another inventor had made the invention earlier. Many of the substantive changes to patent law associated with the Leahy Smith Act, in particular, the first to file provisions, only became effective recently. Accordingly, it is not clear what, if any, impact the Leahy Smith Act will have on the operation of our business. The Leahy Smith Act and its implementation could increase the uncertainties and costs surrounding the prosecution of our patent applications and the enforcement or defense of our issued patents, all of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. In addition, patent reform legislation may pass in the future that could lead to additional uncertainties and increased costs surrounding the prosecution, enforcement and defense of our patents and applications. Furthermore, the U.S. Supreme Court and the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit have made, and will likely continue to make, changes in how the patent laws of the U. S. are interpreted. Similarly, foreign courts have made, and will likely continue to make, changes in how the patent laws in their respective jurisdictions are interpreted. We cannot predict future changes in the interpretation of patent laws or changes to patent laws that might be enacted into law by U. S. and foreign legislative bodies. Those changes may materially affect our patents or patent applications and our ability to obtain additional patent protection in the future. 36 Table of Contents Obtaining and maintaining patent protection depends on compliance with various procedural, document submission, fee payment and other requirements imposed by governmental patent agencies, and our patent protection could be reduced or eliminated for non compliance with these requirements. The USPTO and various foreign patent offices require compliance with a number of procedural, documentary, fee payment and other similar provisions. In addition, periodic maintenance fees on our owned and in licensed patents are due to be paid to governmental patent agencies over the lifetime of the patents. Future maintenance fees will also need to be paid on other patents that may be issued to us. We have systems in place to remind us to pay these fees, and we employ outside firms to remind us or our licensor to pay annuity fees due to patent agencies on our patents and pending patent applications. In certain cases, an inadvertent lapse can be cured by payment of a late fee or by other means in accordance with the applicable rules. However, there are situations in which noncompliance can result in abandonment or lapse of the patent or patent application, resulting in partial or complete loss of patent rights in the relevant jurisdiction. In such an event, our competitors might be able to enter the market and this circumstance would have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. If our trademarks and trade names are not adequately protected, then we may not be able to build name recognition in our markets of interest and our business may be adversely affected. We currently own nine trademarks, related to our company name, logo, products and technology, that are registered with the USPTO as well as six trademarks registered in Europe and Japan. Our registered or unregistered trademarks or trade names may be challenged, infringed, circumvented, declared generic or determined to be infringing on other marks or names. We may not be able to protect our rights in these trademarks and trade names, which we need in order to build name recognition with potential customers in our markets of interest. There is no guarantee we will be able to secure registration for any of our pending trademark applications with the USPTO or comparable foreign authorities. In addition, third parties have registered trademarks similar and identical to our trademarks, and may in the future file for registration of such trademarks. If they succeed in registering or developing common law rights in such trademarks, and if we are not successful in challenging such third party rights, we may not be able to use these trademarks to market our products in those countries where such third parties have registered such trademarks or obtained such common law rights. In any case, if we are unable to establish name recognition based on our trademarks and trade names, then we may not be able to compete effectively and our business may be adversely affected. In addition, we may be involved in litigation or other proceedings to protect our trademark rights associated with our company name or the names used with our products. For example, the U. S. application for registration of our Apollo trademark is currently subject to an opposition proceeding before the Trademark Trial and Appeal Board. An adverse decision in such proceeding could require us to establish an alternative name for our Apollo product line. Any objections we receive from the USPTO, foreign trademark authorities or third parties relating to our pending applications could require us to incur significant expense in defending the objections or establishing alternative names. Names used with our products may be claimed to infringe names held by others or to be ineligible for proprietary protection. If we have to change the name of our company or any product, we may experience a loss in goodwill associated with our brand name, customer confusion or a loss of sales. If we are unable to protect the confidentiality of our trade secrets and other proprietary information, our business and competitive position may be harmed. In addition to patent protection, we also rely on confidential proprietary information, including trade secrets and know how, to develop and maintain our competitive position. We seek to protect our confidential proprietary information, in part, by entering into confidentiality agreements with our employees, consultants, collaborators and others upon the commencement of their relationships with us. These agreements require that all confidential information developed by the individual or made known to the individual by us during the course of the individual relationship with us be kept confidential. Our agreements with employees and our personnel policies also provide that any inventions conceived by the individual in the course of rendering services to us shall be our exclusive property. However, we may not obtain these agreements in all circumstances, and individuals with whom we have these agreements may not comply with their terms. Thus, despite such agreements, such inventions may become assigned to third parties. Monitoring unauthorized uses and disclosures of our intellectual property is difficult, and we do not know whether the steps we have taken to protect our intellectual property will be effective. In the event of unauthorized use or disclosure of our trade secrets or proprietary information, these agreements, even if obtained, may not provide meaningful protection, particularly for our trade secrets or other confidential information. To the extent that our employees, consultants or contractors use technology or know how owned by third parties in their work for us, disputes may arise between us and those third parties as to the rights in related inventions. To the extent that an individual who is not obligated to assign rights in intellectual property to us is rightfully an inventor of intellectual property, we may need to obtain an assignment or a license to that intellectual property from that individual, or a third party or from that individual assignee. Such assignment or license may not be available on commercially reasonable terms or at all. 37 Table of Contents Adequate remedies may not exist in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure of our proprietary information. The disclosure of our trade secrets would impair our competitive position and may materially harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. Costly and time consuming litigation could be necessary to enforce and determine the scope of our proprietary rights, and failure to maintain trade secret protection could adversely affect our competitive business position. In addition, others may independently discover or develop our trade secrets and proprietary information, and the existence of our own trade secrets affords no protection against such independent discovery. We may also employ individuals who were previously or concurrently employed at research institutions and or other medical device companies, including our competitors or potential competitors. We may be subject to claims that these employees, or we, have inadvertently or otherwise used or disclosed trade secrets or other proprietary information of their former employers, or that patents and applications we have filed to protect inventions of these employees, even those related to 1 or more of our products, are rightfully owned by their former or concurrent employer. Litigation may be necessary to defend against these claims. Even if we are successful in defending against these claims, litigation could result in substantial costs and be a distraction to management. Risks Related to Our Finances and Capital Requirements It is difficult to forecast future performance, which may cause our financial results to fluctuate unpredictably. A number of factors over which we have limited or no control may contribute to fluctuations in our financial results, such as variations in revenue due to the unavailability of specialist physicians who use our products during certain times of the year, such as those periods when there are major conferences on conditions they treat or those periods when high volume users of our products take time off of work; positive or negative media coverage of our products or the procedures or products of our competitors or our industry; publication of clinical trial results or studies by us or our competitors; changes in our sales process due to industry changes, such as changes in the stroke care pathway; delays in receipt of anticipated purchase orders; delays in customers receiving products; performance of our independent distributors; our ability to obtain further regulatory clearances or approvals; the timing of product development and clinical trial activities, including the pace of enrollment; delays in, or failure of, product and comp1nt deliveries by our suppliers; changes in reimbursement policies or levels; the number of procedures performed in any given period using our products, which can sometimes vary significantly between periods; customer response to the introduction of new products or alternative treatments, and the degree to we which we are effective in transitioning customers to our products; and fluctuations in foreign currency. In the event our actual revenue and results of operations do not meet our or others forecasts for a particular period, the market price of our common stock may decline substantially. We may require additional financing in the future and may not be able to obtain such financing on favorable terms, if at all, which could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our research and development activities or otherwise harm our business. To date, we have financed our operations primarily through our operations, sales of our equity securities, including in our IPO and borrowings under a line of credit with a financial institution. We are unable to predict the extent of any future operating cash flows or whether we will be able to maintain or grow our profitability. If we require additional financing to continue or expand our operations, for research and development, for acquisitions or for other purposes, we may determine to engage in equity or debt financings or incur other indebtedness. We may not be able to timely secure additional debt or equity financing on favorable terms, or at all. If we raise additional funds through the issuance of equity or convertible debt or other equity linked securities, our existing stockholders could suffer significant dilution. Any debt financing obtained by us in the future could involve restrictive covenants relating to our capital raising activities and other financial and operational matters, which may make it more difficult for us to obtain additional capital and to pursue business opportunities, including potential 38 Table of Contents acquisitions. If needed funds are not available in adequate amounts or on acceptable terms from additional financing sources, our business will be materially adversely affected. If we engage in any acquisitions, we will incur a variety of costs and may potentially face numerous risks that could adversely affect our business and operations. If appropriate opportunities become available, we may seek to acquire additional businesses, assets, technologies or products to enhance our business. In connection with any acquisitions, we could issue additional equity securities or convertible debt or equity linked securities, which would dilute our stockholders, cause us to incur substantial debt to fund the acquisitions, or assume significant liabilities. Acquisitions involve numerous risks, including problems integrating the purchased operations, technologies or products, unanticipated costs and other liabilities, diversion of management attention from our core businesses, adverse effects on existing business relationships with current and or prospective customers and or suppliers, risks associated with entering markets in which we have no or limited prior experience and potential loss of key employees. Acquisitions may also require us to record goodwill and non amortizable intangible assets that will be subject to impairment testing on a regular basis and potential periodic impairment charges, incur amortization expenses related to certain intangible assets, and incur write offs and restructuring and other related expenses, any of which could harm our results of operations and financial condition. If we fail in our integration efforts with respect to any of our acquisitions and are unable to efficiently operate as a combined organization, our business and financial condition may be adversely affected. Risks Relating to Securities Markets and Investment in Our Common Stock The price of our common stock may be volatile, and you could lose all or part of your investment. The trading price of our common stock has been and is likely to continue to be volatile. Our closing stock price as reported on The New York Stock Exchange ( NYSE) has ranged from $35.31 to $59.36 since our IPO on September 18, 2015 through December 31, 2015. Stock markets have experienced extreme volatility that has often been unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. These broad market fluctuations may adversely affect the trading price of our common stock. In addition, limited trading volume of our stock may contribute to its future volatility. Price declines in our common stock could result from general market and economic conditions, some of which are beyond our control, and a variety of other factors, including any of the risk factors described in this Annual Report on Form 10 K or those that we have not anticipated. These broad market and industry factors may harm the market price of our common stock, regardless of our operating performance, and could cause you to lose all or part of your investment in our common stock since you might be unable to sell your shares at or above the price you paid for such shares. Factors that could cause fluctuations in the market price of our common stock include the following price and volume fluctuations in the overall stock market from time to time; volatility in the market prices and trading volumes of medical device company stocks; changes in operating performance and stock market valuations of other medical device companies generally, or those in our industry in particular; sales of shares of our common stock by us or our stockholders; failure of securities analysts to maintain coverage of us, changes in financial estimates by securities analysts who follow our company, or our failure to meet these estimates or the expectations of investors; the financial projections we may provide to the public, any changes in those projections or our failure to meet those projections; announcements by us or our competitors of new products or services; the public reaction to our press releases, other public announcements and filings with the SEC; rumors and market speculation involving us or other companies in our industry; actual or anticipated changes in our results of operations or fluctuations in our results of operations; actual or anticipated developments in our business, our competitors businesses or the competitive landscape generally; litigation involving us, our industry or both, or investigations by regulators into our operations or those of our competitors; developments or disputes concerning our intellectual property or other proprietary rights; announced or completed acquisitions of businesses or technologies by us or our competitors; 39 Table of Contents new laws or regulations or new interpretations of existing laws or regulations applicable to our business; changes in accounting standards, policies, guidelines, interpretations or principles; any significant change in our management; and general economic conditions and slow or negative growth of our markets. In addition, in the past, following periods of volatility in the overall market and the market price of a particular company securities, securities class action litigation has often been instituted against these companies. This litigation, if instituted against us, could result in substantial costs and a diversion of our management attention and resources. If our executive officers, directors and largest stockholders choose to act together, they may be able to significantly influence our management and operations, acting in their own best interests and not necessarily those of other stockholders. As of December 31, 2015 , our executive officers, directors and holders of 5% or more of our outstanding stock and their affiliates beneficially owned approximately 334% of our voting stock in the aggregate. These stockholders, acting together, would be able to significantly influence all matters requiring approval by our stockholders, including the election of directors and the approval of mergers or other business combination transactions. The interests of this group of stockholders may not always coincide with the interests of other stockholders, and they may act in a manner that advances their best interests and not necessarily those of other stockholders. This concentration of ownership may have the effect of delaying, preventing or deterring a change in control of our company, could deprive our stockholders of an opportunity to receive a premium for their common stock as part of a sale of our company and might ultimately affect the market price of our common stock. A significant portion of our outstanding shares of common stock is restricted from immediate resale but may be sold into the market in the near future. This could cause the market price of our common stock to drop significantly, even if our business is doing well. Sales of a substantial number of shares of our common stock could occur at any time. In particular, the 4,600,000 shares we sold in our IPO may be resold without restriction. In addition, approximately, 26 million shares of our common stock were subject to lock up, as part of the underwriting condition by the underwriters of our IPO, that expires on March 16, 2016 and a substantial portion of these shares may be freely sold after that date. These sales, or the perception in the market that the holders of a large number of shares of common stock intend to sell shares, could reduce the market price of our common stock. As of December 31, 2015 , our directors, executive officers and holders of 5% or more of our outstanding stock beneficially owned approximately 334% of our outstanding stock in the aggregate. If 1 or more of them were to sell a substantial portion of the shares they hold, it could cause our stock price to decline. Furthermore, the lock up menti1d above may be waived by the underwriters at any time which could lead to these shares being sold in the market prior to March 16, 2016. In addition, as of December 31, 2015 , there were 3,755,345 shares subject to outstanding options that will become eligible for sale in the public market upon exercise of such options to the extent permitted by any applicable vesting requirements, the lock up agreements, market standoff provisions and Rules 144 and 701 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (Securities Act). Holders of an aggregate of 21,617,845 shares of our common stock have rights, subject to some conditions, to require us to file registration statements covering their shares or to include their shares in registration statements that we may file for ourselves or other stockholders. We have registered 3,600,000 shares of common stock that were initially reserved for issuance under our Amended and Restated 2014 Equity Incentive Plan and our 2015 Employee Stock Purchase Plan. These shares can be freely sold in the public market upon issuance. Sales of our common stock as restrictions end or pursuant to registration rights may make it more difficult for us to sell equity securities in the future at a time and at a price that we deem appropriate. These sales also could cause the price of our common stock to fall and make it more difficult for you to sell shares of our common stock. Our restated certificate of incorporation, our amended and restated bylaws and Delaware law contain provisions that could discourage another company from acquiring us and may prevent attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove our current management. Provisions of Delaware law (where we are incorporated), our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws may discourage, delay or prevent a merger or acquisition that stockholders may consider favorable, including transactions in which you might otherwise receive a premium for your shares. In addition, these provisions may frustrate or prevent any attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove our current management by making it more difficult for stockholders to replace or remove our board of directors. These provisions include authorizing the issuance of blank check preferred stock without any need for action by stockholders; 40 Table of Contents requiring supermajority stockholder voting to effect certain amendments to our restated certificate of incorporation and amended and restated bylaws; eliminating the ability of stockholders to call and bring business before special meetings of stockholders; prohibiting stockholder action by written consent; establishing advance notice requirements for nominations for election to the board of directors or for proposing matters that can be acted on by stockholders at stockholder meetings; dividing our board of directors into 3 classes so that only 1 third of our directors will be up for election in any given year; and providing that our directors may be removed by our stockholders only for cause. I n addition, we are subject to Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which may have an anti takeover effect with respect to transactions not approved in advance by our board of directors, including discouraging takeover attempts that could have resulted in a premium over the market price for shares of our common stock. These provisions apply even if a takeover offer may be considered beneficial by some stockholders and could delay or prevent an acquisition that our board of directors determines is not in our and our stockholders best interests and could also affect the price that some investors are willing to pay for our common stock. See the section titled Description of Capital Stock. Our restated certificate of incorporation provides that the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware is the exclusive forum for substantially all disputes between us and our stockholders, which could limit our stockholders ability to obtain a favorable judicial forum for disputes with us or our directors, officers or employees. Our restated certificate of incorporation provides that the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware is the exclusive forum for any derivative action or proceeding brought on our behalf; any action asserting a breach of fiduciary duty; any action asserting a claim against us arising pursuant to the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware, our restated certificate of incorporation or our amended and restated bylaws; or any action asserting a claim against us that is governed by the internal affairs doctrine. The choice of forum provision may limit a stockholder ability to bring a claim in a judicial forum that it finds favorable for disputes with us or our directors, officers or other employees, which may discourage such lawsuits against us and our directors, officers and other employees. If a court were to find the choice of forum provision contained in our restated certificate of incorporation to be inapplicable or unenforceable in an action, we may incur additional costs associated with resolving such action in other jurisdictions, which could harm our business and financial condition. We incur significantly increased costs and devote substantial management time as a result of operating as a public company. As a public company, we incur significant legal, accounting and other expenses. In addition, our administrative staff is required to perform additional tasks. We are subject to the reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act), and are required to comply with the applicable requirements of the Sarbanes Oxley Act of 2002 (the Sarbanes Oxley Act), and the Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, as well as rules and regulations subsequently implemented by the SEC and the NYSE, including the establishment and maintenance of effective disclosure and financial controls and changes in corporate governance practices. We expect that compliance with these requirements will increase our legal and financial compliance costs and will make some activities more time consuming and costly. We are investing resources to comply with the evolving laws, regulations and standards applicable to public companies, and this investment may result in increased general and administrative expenses and a diversion of management time and attention from revenue generating activities to compliance activities. Operating as a public company and being subject to these rules and regulations makes it more expensive for us to obtain director and officer liability insurance, and we may be required to accept reduced coverage or incur substantially higher costs to obtain coverage. As a result, it may be difficult for us to attract and retain qualified members of our board of directors or executive officers. The costs associated with operating as a public company may decrease our net income or increase any future net loss and may cause us to reduce costs in other areas of our business or increase the prices of our products to offset the effect of such costs. Additionally, if these requirements divert our management attention from other business concerns, they could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operation, financial condition or cash flows. We are an emerging growth company, and we cannot be certain if the reduced reporting requirements applicable to emerging growth companies will make our common stock less attractive to investors. We are an emerging growth company, as defined in the Jumpstart our Business Startups Act of 2012 (JOBS Act). For as long as we continue to be an emerging growth company, we may take advantage of exemptions from various reporting 41 Table of Contents requirements that are applicable to other public companies but not to emerging growth companies, including, but not limited to not being required to comply with the auditor attestation requirements in the assessment of our internal control over financial reporting under Section 404 of the Sarbanes Oxley Act; not being required to comply with any requirement that may be adopted by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board regarding mandatory audit firm rotation or a supplement to the auditor report providing additional information about the audit and the financial statements; reduced disclosure obligations regarding executive compensation in our periodic reports and proxy statements; and exemptions from the requirements of holding a nonbinding advisory vote on executive compensation and shareholder approval of any golden parachute payments not previously approved. We will remain an emerging growth company until the earlier of (1) the last day of the fiscal year (a) following the fifth anniversary of the completion of our IPO, (b) in which we have total annual gross revenue of at least $1 billion, or (c) in which we are deemed to be a large accelerated filer, which means the market value of our common stock that is held by non affiliates exceeds $700 million as of the prior June 30th, and (2) the date on which we have issued more than $1 billion in non convertible debt during the prior 3 year period. We cannot predict if investors will find our common stock less attractive if we choose to rely on these exemptions. If some investors find our common stock less attractive as a result of any choices to reduce future disclosure, there may be a less active trading market for our common stock and the price of our common stock may be more volatile. Under the JOBS Act, emerging growth companies can also delay adopting new or revised accounting standards until such time as those standards apply to private companies. We have irrevocably elected not to avail ourselves of this exemption from new or revised accounting standards and, therefore, will be subject to the same new or revised accounting standards as other public companies that are not emerging growth companies. If we fail to maintain an effective system of disclosure controls and internal control over financial reporting, our ability to produce timely and accurate financial statements or comply with applicable regulations could be impaired. As a public company, we are subject to the reporting requirements of the Exchange Act, Sarbanes Oxley Act, and the listing standards of the NYSE. We expect that the requirements of these rules and regulations will continue to increase our legal, accounting and financial compliance costs, make some activities more difficult, time consuming and costly, and place significant strain on our personnel, systems and resources. The Sarbanes Oxley Act requires, among other things, that we maintain effective disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting. We are continuing to develop and refine our disclosure controls and other procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we will file with the SEC is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in SEC rules and forms, and that information required to be disclosed in reports under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to our principal executive and financial officers. We are also continuing to improve our internal control over financial reporting. In order to maintain and improve the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting, we have expended, and anticipate that we will continue to expend, significant resources, including accounting related costs and significant management oversight. Our current controls and any new controls that we develop may become inadequate because of changes in our business. Further, weaknesses in our disclosure controls or our internal control over financial reporting may be discovered in the future. Any failure to develop or maintain effective controls, or any difficulties encountered in their implementation or improvement, could harm our operating results or cause us to fail to meet our reporting obligations and may result in errors in our financial statements or a restatement of our financial statements for prior periods. Any failure to implement and maintain effective internal control over financial reporting also could adversely affect the results of management evaluations and independent registered public accounting firm audits of our internal control over financial reporting that we will eventually be required to include in our periodic reports that will be filed with the SEC. Ineffective disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting could also cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial and other information, which would likely have a negative effect on the trading price of our common stock. In addition, if we are unable to continue to meet these requirements, we may not be able to remain listed on the NYSE. We are not currently required to comply with the SEC rules that implement Section 404 of the Sarbanes Oxley Act, and are therefore not required to make a formal assessment of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting for that purpose. As a public company, we will be required to provide an annual management report on the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting commencing with our second Annual Report on Form 10 K. Our independent registered public accounting firm is not required to audit the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting until 42 Table of Contents after we are no longer an emerging growth company, as defined in the JOBS Act. At such time, our independent registered public accounting firm may issue a report that is adverse in the event it is not satisfied with the level at which our internal control over financial reporting is documented, designed or operating. If we have a material weakness in our internal control over financial reporting, we may not detect errors on a timely basis and our financial statements may be materially misstated. We are in the process of designing and implementing the internal control over financial reporting required to comply with this obligation, which process will be time consuming, costly and complicated. If we identify material weaknesses in our internal control over financial reporting, if we are unable to comply with the requirements of Section 404 in a timely manner, if we are unable to assert that our internal control over financial reporting are effective, or, when required in the future, if our independent registered public accounting firm is unable to express an opinion as to the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting, investors may lose confidence in the accuracy and completeness of our financial reports and the market price of our common stock could be adversely affected, and we could become subject to investigations by the stock exchange on which our securities are listed, the SEC, or other regulatory authorities, which could require additional financial and management resources. Any failure to maintain effective disclosure controls and internal control over financial reporting could have a material and adverse effect on our business and results of operations, and cause a decline in the price of our common stock. If securities or industry analysts publish inaccurate or unfavorable research about our business or cease publishing research, our stock price and trading volume could decline. The trading market for our common stock depends in part on the research and reports that securities or industry analysts publish about us or our business. If 1 or more of the analysts who cover us downgrade our stock or publish inaccurate or unfavorable research about our business, our stock price would likely decline. If 1 or more of these analysts cease coverage of our company or fail to publish reports on us regularly, demand for our stock could decrease, which might cause our stock price and trading volume to decline. We do not anticipate paying cash dividends, and accordingly, stockholders must rely on stock appreciation for any return on their investment. We do not anticipate paying cash dividends in the future. As a result, only appreciation of the price of our common stock, which may never occur, would provide a return to stockholders. Investors seeking cash dividends should not invest in our common stock. Impairment of our deferred tax assets could require a charge to earnings, which could result in a negative impact on our results of operations. Primarily as a result of net operating losses, stock based compensation, various accruals and reserves, and tax credits, we maintain a deferred tax asset (an asset recognized to reflect an expected benefit to be realized in the future) that may be used to reduce the amount of tax that we would otherwise be required to pay in future periods. Deferred tax assets are reduced by a valuation allowance when it is more likely than not that the future realization of all or some of the deferred tax assets will not be achieved. Valuation allowances related to deferred tax assets can be affected by changes to tax laws, statutory tax rates, future taxable income levels and input from our tax advisors or regulatory authorities. At December 31, 2015 , our net deferred tax asset was $10.1 million, after reduction of a valuation allowance of $27 million. If our management was to determine that we would not be able to realize all or a portion of our net deferred tax assets in the future, a valuation allowance and a related charge to earnings would be reflected in that period, which could have a material adverse impact on our financial condition and results of operations. 43 Table of Contents ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS. N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES.
